The University of Mumbai is a public state university in Mumbai. It is one of the largest university systems in the world with over 549,000 students on its campuses and affiliated colleges.
As of 2013, the university had 711 affiliated colleges. Ratan Tata is the appointed head of the advisory council.
History

In accordance with "Wood's despatch", drafted by Sir Charles Wood in 1854, the University of Bombay was established in 1857 after the presentation of a petition from the Bombay Association
to the British colonial government in India.The University of Mumbai was modelled on similar universities in the United Kingdom, specifically the University of London. 

The first departments established were the Faculty of Arts at Elphinstone College in 1835 and the Faculty of Medicine at Grant Medical College in 1845.Both colleges existed before the university was founded
and surrendered their degree-granting privileges to the university. The first degrees awarded in 1862 were Bachelor of Arts and Licentiate in Medicine.Medical schools such as Sindh Medical School in Hyderabad,
Sindh were affiliated with the university as well.

Cornelia Sorabji, who later studied law at Somerville College becoming Oxford's first female law student and India's first female advocate, was the university's first female graduate in 1888.

Until 1904, the university only conducted examinations, awarded affiliations to colleges, developed curricula, and produced guidelines for colleges developing curricula.Teaching departments, research
disciplines, and post-graduate courses were introduced from 1904, and several additional departments were established. After India achieved independence in 1947, the functions and powers of the university were
reorganized under The Bombay University Act of 1953.The name of the university was changed from University of Bombay to University of Mumbai in 1996.

In 1949, student enrolment was 42,272 with 80 affiliated colleges. By 1975, these numbers had grown to 156,190 and 114 respectively.
Kalina Campus

Examination processes were made more efficient by the introduction of online delivery of question papers for examinations, and assessment of answer books by scanning at remote examination centres. The academic
depository of the university was started in collaboration with CDSL in 2015. The university is the first university in the country to start an academic depository.

Jawaharlal Nehru Library
Alkesh Dinesh Mody Institute for Financial and Management Studies (ADMI) which offers BMS, MFSM, MS Finance & MMS programmes

Library
University Library at the Fort Campus.
Main article: University Library, Mumbai
Rajabai Clock Tower
Rajabai Clock Tower, located at the Fort campus, was built in 1878.

One of Mumbai's landmarks, the Rajabai Clock Tower, was completed in the 1870s and houses the University of Mumbai's library. Sir George Gilbert Scott modeled the Rajabai Clock Tower on the clock tower of the
Palace of Westminster in London.Local businessman Premchand Roychand contributed to the cost of construction and named the tower in memory of his mother, Rajabai. The tower is 85 m (280 ft) tall and has five
storeys. At a height of 9.1 m (30 ft) from the ground, there are eight statues representing the Indian castes. The tower clock is reported to have played 16 tunes including "Rule Britannia", "God Save the
Queen", "Home! Sweet Home!" and "A Handel Symphony".On the initiative of the then Vice-Chancellor, Rajan Welukar, the first phase of restoration of Rajabai Clock Tower started in 2013 and was completed in May
2015. Tata Consultancy Services (TCS) gave a Rs 4 crore grant for this phase of the restoration project.

The Convocation Hall or Cowasji Jehangir Convocation Hall at the University of Mumbai is part of the Victorian buildings complex around the Oval Maidan in Mumbai that is a UNESCO World Heritage Site. It was
built between 1869 and 1874, and designed by Sir George Gilbert Scott, who incidentally never visited Bombay and worked from London.

It is also known as the Cowasji Jehangir Convocation Hall, after the Parsi philanthropist Cowasji Jehangir Readymoney, who funded the construction.In 2006–07, the hall was restored by a team led by the
conservation architect Abha Narain Lambah. The project was given the Award of Distinction under the UNESCO Asia-Pacific Awards for Cultural Heritage Conservation.

Affiliated colleges
Its jurisdiction extends over 7 districts - Mumbai City district, Mumbai Suburban district, Palghar district, Raigad district, Ratnagiri district, Sindhudurg district, Thane district.
Prominent institutes

Several departments of the University of Mumbai are a part of vocational institutions and are not located on the four Mumbai campuses. These include the departments of Medicine and Medical Research located in
many prominent hospitals in Mumbai, such as the Tata Memorial Hospital, Bombay Hospital and G.S. Medical College and King Edward Memorial Hospital. The Department of Medicine at Tata Memorial Hospital is now
affiliated to the Homi Bhabha National Institute.

Institute of Chemical Technology (then known as the University Department of Chemical Technology, UDCT), was originally a department of MU, which later gained the status of a university.

Veermata Jijabai Technological Institute, then known as the Victorial Jubilee Technical Institute, founded in 1887, was the first Engineering Institute of the University of Mumbai. Thadomal Shahani Engineering
College was the first Engineering college in the University of Mumbai to start courses in Computer Engineering, Information Technology, Electronics Engineering and Biomedical Engineering.

Mumbai City district is a district of Maharashtra in Konkan Division, India. As a city district, it has no headquarters or subdivisions. It, along with the Mumbai Suburban District, makes up the metropolis of
Mumbai. This area is called the "Island City" or South Mumbai or Old Mumbai. It extends from Colaba in the south to Mahim and Sion in the north. The city has an area of 157 km2 (61 sq mi) and a population of
3,085,411.

Vice-chancellors

    John Wilson – 1857
    Raymond West
    Alexander Kinloch Forbes
    Sir Alexander Grant, 10th Baronet – 1863–1868
    William Guyer Hunter – 1869
    Herbert Mills Birdwood
    Rev Dugald Mackichan – 1888-91
    Kashinath Trimbak Telang – 1892–1893
    Ramkrishna Gopal Bhandarkar – 1893–1894
    N. G. Chandavarkar – 1911−1912
    John Heaton – 1912–1915
    Pherozeshah Mehta – 1915
    Sir Leslie Orme Wilson (Chancellor) - 1927
    Mirza Akbar Khan – 1930–31
    R. P. Paranjpye – 1934
    Sir Rustom Pestonji Masani - 1941
    Pandurang Vaman Kane
    John Matthai – 1955–1957
    V. R. Khanolkar – 1960–1963
    Shashikant Karnik
    Trimbak Krishna Tope – 1971–1977
    M. D. Bengalee – 1986-1992
    Snehlata Deshmukh – 1995–2000
    Bhalchandra Mungekar – 2000–2005
    Vijay Khole – 2005 – September 2009
    Chandra Krishnamurthy – September 2009–July 2010, Acting Vice-Chancellor
    Suhas Pednekar - August 2010 - September 2010, Acting Vice-Chancellor
    Rajan Welukar – October 2010 – July 2015
    Sanjay V. Deshmukh – July 2015 – October 2017
    Suhas Pednekar - April 2018 − Present
    Dr. Ravindra D Kulkarni - June 2023 - Present
    
The University of Mumbai (known earlier as University of Bombay) is one of the oldest and premier Universities in India. It was established in 1857 consequent to 'Wood's Education Dispatch drafted by Charles
Wood in 1854. University of Mumbai was established along with University of Madras and University of Calcutta.

'University of Bombay' was renamed as 'University of Mumbai' through notification issued by the Government of Maharashtra and published in the Government Gazette dated 4th September, 1996.

The University has always given its best to the country in general and to the city of Mumbai in particular by enthusiastically contributing to various academic, research and social initiatives.

Initially, the University concentrated its efforts on offering undergraduate courses. Later, University focus moved to establishing and enriching Post-Graduate teaching and research initiatives. This resulted
in the establishment of the University Departments beginning with the School of Sociology and Civics & Politics. The independence of the country led to the re-organization of the functions and powers of the
University with the passing of the Bombay University Act of 1953. University has also established its name in industrial collaborations and runs various professional courses.

University of Mumbai has been accredited with 'Five Star' status by the National Assessment and Accreditation Council (NAAC). It has two campuses of area 230 acres and 13 acres. It also has sub-centres at
Thane, Kalyan and Ratnagiri. University of Mumbai is one of the largest Universities in world in terms of number of Student enrolled very year. More than 700 Colleges and Institutions are affiliated with
University of Mumbai.

University of Mumbai has excelled in sports, cultural and out-reach activities. Many departments of University of Mumbai are recognized under various national programs, such as SAP/CAS/ DRS/DSA / COSIST /
FIST.

R. 8433 : The definitions of the key terms used in the Credit Based
Semester and Grading System introduced from the academic year 2011-12
are as under:
Program:
A Program is a set of courses that are linked together in an academically meaningful way and generally ends with the award of a Certificate or Diploma or Degree depending on the level of knowledge attained and
the total duration of study.
B.A., B.Sc. and B.Com. are Programs.
Course
A ‘course’ corresponds to the word ‘subject’ used in many universities. A course is
essentially a constituent of a ‘program’ and may be conceived of as a composite of several
learning topics taken from a certain knowledge domain, at a certain level. All the learning
topics included in a course must necessarily have academic coherence, that is, there must be a
common thread linking the various components of a course. A number of linked courses
considered together are in practice, a ‘program’.
Module and Unit:
A course which is generally an independent entity having its own separate identity, is also
often referred to as a ‘Module’ in today’s parlance, especially when we refer to a ‘modular
curricular structure’. A module may be studied in conjunction with other learning modules or
studied independently. A topic within a course is treated as a Unit.
Credit Point:
Credit Point refers to the ‘Workload’ of a learner and is an index of the number of learning
hours deemed for a certain segment of learning. These learning hours may include a variety of
learning activities like reading, reflecting, discussing, attending lectures / counseling sessions,
watching especially prepared videos, writing assignments, preparing for examinations, etc.
Credits assigned for a single course always pay attention to how many hours it would take for
a learner to complete a single course successfully. A single course should have, by and large a
course may be assigned anywhere between 2 to 8 credit points wherein 1 credit is construed
as corresponding to approximately 30 to 40 learning hours.
Credit completion and Credit accumulation:
Credit completion or Credit acquisition shall be considered to take place after the learner has
successfully cleared all the evaluation criteria with respect to a single course. Thus, a learner
who successfully completes a 4 CP (Credit Point) course may be considered to have collected
or acquired 4 credits. His level of performance above the minimum prescribed level (viz.grades / marks obtained) has no bearing on the number of credits collected or acquired. A
learner keeps on adding more and more credits as he completes successfully more and more
courses. Thus the learner ‘accumulates’ course wise credits.
Credit Bank:
The process of accumulating Credits over a period of time, leads to the idea of a ‘Credit
Bank’. Conceptually, a Credit Bank in simple terms refers to stored and dynamically updated
information regarding the number of Credits obtained by any given learner along with details
regarding the course/s for which Credit has been given, the course-level, nature, etc. In
addition, all the information regarding the number of Credits transferred to different programs
or credit exemptions given may also be stored with the individual’s history. In short, this
would involve maintaining all the Credit–related transactions of an individual. Credit
Banking, when practiced would go a long way in facilitating credit transfers and learner
mobility.
Credit Transfer:
Performance transfer
When a learner successfully completes a certain academic program, he/she is allowed to
transfer his/her past performance to another academic program having some common courses
and Performance transfer is said to have taken place.
Course exemption
Occasionally, when two academic programs offered by a single university or by more than one
university, may have some common or equivalent course-content, the learner who has already
completed one of these academic programs is allowed to skip these ‘equivalent’ courses while
registering for the new program. The Learner is ‘exempted’ from ‘relearning’ the common or
equivalent content area and from re-appearing for the concerned examinations. It is thus taken
for granted that the learner has already collected in the past the credits corresponding to the
exempted courses.
Block Transfer:
Block transfer refers to a group of courses, such as a completed certificate or diploma program
that are accepted for transfer of credit into a degree program.
Dimensions of Credit Transfer
When a learner successfully completes the courses included in an academic program at a
certain level, he/she is allowed to transfer his/her credits in some of these courses to another
same-level academic program having these courses in common. This is referred to as
‘Horizontal or Lateral Credit Transfer’.
‘Vertical Credit Transfer’, sometimes is also referred to as ‘Career Laddering’ is said to
occur when a learner’s performance in some courses within a certain academic program at a
particular level is carried over to a higher-level academic program having these or equivalent
courses in common.
Credit Transfer is conceived as operating along lateral (or horizontal) and vertical
transfers.
Types of Credit Transfer
When the process of credit transfer takes place within a university department or institution, it
may be called intra-institutional credit transfer; when the credit transfer process operates
across two or more institutions/universities, this may be viewed as inter-institutional/inter-
university credit transfer. Both inter/intra institutional/university credit transfer operate across
levels – vertical or horizontal.
Note: The Ordinances and Regulations given below are applicable to Faculty of Arts,
Commerce & Science unless and otherwise specified.
O. 5974
Duration of the B.A., B.Com. and B.Sc. programme will be of 3 years in the Semester pattern
i.e. from Sem. I to Sem. VI.
The degree will be awarded to a learner who successfully completes 120 credits of the
programme in period of 3 to 6 years from the year of enrollment to semester I.
If a learner does not earn 120 credits in 12 semesters from the year of enrolment to semester I,
he/she may at his/her option transfer his/her performance in the existing/new program after
establishing equivalence between old and new syllabus. Such a performance transfer will be
decided by the Board of Studies / Ad-hoc Board / Ad hoc Committee of the concerned
subject.
The admission to the program will be governed by the existing rules
O. 5975
The fees for transfer of credits or performance will be based on number of credits that a
learner has to complete for award of the degree.
O. 5976
The following credit transfers will be allowed
Intra-institutional/University lateral credit transfer
Intra-institutional/University vertical credit transfer
Inter-institutional/University lateral credit transfer
Inter-institutional/University vertical credit transfer

R.8434
Credits earned at one institution for one or more courses under a given program will be accepted under another program either by the same institution or another institution either through Direct Performance
Transfer or Course exemption.

R.8435 : The Scheme of Examination:
FACULTY OF SCIENCE:
The Scheme of Examination shall be divided into two components: Internal assessment and External assessment (semester end examination) for each course of the program. Internal Assessment includes Assignments,
Seminars, Case Studies, Quizzes, Viva, Open book test, Unit Tests etc. For each course, there is a passing minimum for internal Assessment as 40% (16 out of 40 marks), for External / Semester End Examination
40% (24 out of 60 marks) and overall 40% (40 out of 100 marks).
The performance of the learner will be evaluated in each course in the following manner:
Internal Assessment Semester End Examination Total (for each course or head of passing)
40 % 60 % 100%

The internal assessment of 40 % for each course will be as follows:
Courses with practical (for Theory Component)
Sr. No Evaluation type Marks
1 Two Assignments/Case study/Project 20
2 One class Test (multiple choice questions objective) 10
3 Active participation in routine class instructional deliveries(case studies/seminars//presentation) 05
4 Overall conduct as a responsible learner, manners, skill in articulation, leadership qualities demonstrated through organizing co-curricular activities, etc. 05

Practical:
Each practical course can be conducted out of 50 marks with 20 marks for internal and 30 marks for external.

Practical (Internal component of the Practical Course)
Sr No Evaluation type Marks
1 Two best practical 10
2 Journal 05
3 Viva 05

Courses with tutorials (Mathematics):
Sr No Evaluation type Marks
1 Two Assignments (one Tutorial converted into assignment) / Case studies / Project 20
2 One class Test [Tutorial converted into test] 10
3 Active participation in routine class instructional deliveries/Tutorials 05
4 Overall conduct as a responsible learner, mannerism and articulation and exhibit of leadership qualities in organizing related academic activities 05

The semester end examination (external component) of 60% for each course will be as follows:
i) Duration – 2 Hours
ii) Theory Question Paper Pattern:-
1. There shall be four questions each of 15 marks. On each unit, there will be one question and the fourth one will be based on the entire syllabus.
2. All questions shall be compulsory with internal choice within the questions. (Each question will be of 20 to 23 marks with options.)
3. Questions may be subdivided into sub-questions a, b, c… and the allocation of marks depends on the weightage of the topic.

The marks will be given for all examinations, and they will be converted into grade (quality) points. The semester-end, final grade sheets, and transcripts will have only credits, grades, grade points, SGPA,
and CGPA.

FACULTY OF ARTS:
The performance of the learners shall be evaluated into two components. The learner’s performance shall be assessed by Internal Assessment with 40% marks in the first component by conducting the Semester End
Examinations with 60% marks in the second component. The allocation of marks for the Internal Assessment and Semester End Examinations are as shown below:-
a) Internal Assessment – 40% 40 Marks

Sr. No. Particulars Marks
1 One periodical class test held in the given semester 10 Marks
2 Subject specific Term Work Module/assessment modes – at least two- as decided by the department in the beginning of the semester (like Extension/field/experimental work, Short Quiz; Objective test, lab
practical, open book test etc and written assignments, Case study, Projects, Posters and exhibits etc for which the assessment is to be based on class presentations wherever applicable) to be selflessly
assessed by the teacher/s concerned 20 Marks
3 Active participation in routine class instructional deliveries (and in practical work, tutorial, field work etc as the case may be ) 05 Marks
4 Overall conduct as a responsible learner, mannerism and articulation and exhibit of leadership qualities in organizing related academic activities 05 Marks

Projects in Semesters V and/or VI (of 50 marks each)
Report Submitted 40 marks
Presentation & Viva Voce 10 marks
Total 50 marks

The semester end examination (external component) of 60 % for each course will be as follows:
i) Duration – 2 Hours
ii) Theory Question Paper Pattern:-
1. There shall be four questions each of 15 marks. On each unit there will be one question and the fourth one will be based on the entire syllabus.
2. All questions shall be compulsory with internal choice within the questions. (Each question will be of 20 to 23 marks with options.)
3. Questions may be subdivided into sub-questions a, b, c… and the allocation of marks depend on the weightage of the topic.

FACULTY OF COMMERCE
The performance of the learners shall be evaluated in two components: Internal Assessment with 40% marks by way of continuous evaluation and by Semester End Examination with 60% marks by conducting the theory
examination.

INTERNAL ASSESSMENT:- It is defined as the assessment of the learners on the basis of continuous evaluation as envisaged in the credit based system by way of participation of learners in various academic and
correlated activities in the given semester of the programme.

A). Internal Assessment – 40% 40 marks
1. For Courses without practical.
Sr. No. Particulars Marks
1 Two periodical class tests/case study/online examination to be conducted in the given semester 20 Marks
2 One assignment based on curriculum to be assessed by the teacher concerned 10 Marks
3 Active participation in routine class instructional deliveries 05 Marks
4 Overall conduct as a responsible learner, mannerism and articulation and exhibit of leadership qualities in organizing related academic activities 05 Marks

2. For Courses with Practical.
Sr. No. Particulars Marks
1 Semester End Practical Examination
   Journal 05 Marks
   Viva 05 Marks
   Laboratory Work 10 Marks
2. One assignment/project with class presentation to be assessed by teacher concerned
   Presentation 05 Marks
   Written Document 05 Marks
3 Active participation in routine class instructional deliveries 05 Marks
4 Overall conduct as a responsible learner, mannerism and articulation and exhibit of leadership qualities in organizing related academic activities 05 Marks

ONLY FOR COURSE IN FOUNDATION COURSE I AND COURSE II (FOR THE FACULTY OF ARTS AND SCIENCE)

Sr. No. Particulars Marks
1 One periodical class test/case study/online examination to be conducted in the given semester 10 Marks
2 Assignment/project based on curriculum to be assessed by the teacher concerned. The student will have to submit the assignment/project before appearing for the Semester End Examination. Assignment will be
entirely based on Unit 6 and can take the form of street-plays/exhibition/power-point presentation or similar other modes suitable to the topic selected. Students can work in a group of not more than 8
students for the purpose of assignment/project. Students will have to submit the hard copy of the assignment/project before appearing for the Semester End Examinations. The assignment will be evaluated for 20
marks of which 10 marks shall be allotted to Viva, to assess the level of engagement of the students with the topic concerned. 20 Marks
3 Active participation in routine class instructional deliveries 05 Marks
4 Overall conduct as a responsible learner, mannerism and articulation and exhibit of leadership qualities in organizing related academic activities 05 Marks

SEMESTER END EXAMINATION:- It is defined as the examination of the learners on the basis of performance in the semester end theory/written examinations.

B. Semester End Examination --- 60 % 60 Marks
1) Duration – These examinations shall be of 2 Hours duration.
2) Question Paper Pattern:-
i. There shall be four questions each of 15 marks.
ii. All questions shall be compulsory with internal choice within the questions.
iii. Question may be sub-divided into sub-questions a, b, c, d & e only and the allocation of marks depends on the weightage of the topic.

The assessment of Part ‘A’ i.e. Internal Assessment and Part ‘B’ i.e. Semester End Examination as mentioned above for the Semesters I to IV shall be processed by the Colleges / Institutions of their learners
and issue the grade cards to them after the conversion of marks into grade as per the procedure mentioned in this manual. The format of the grade card is given in the Chapter 5 of the manual to maintain the
uniformity across all colleges for the examinations conducted by the colleges on behalf of the University.

The assessment of Part ‘A’ i.e. Internal Assessment as mentioned above for the Semesters V & VI shall be processed by the Colleges / Institutions of their learners admitted for the programme while the
University shall conduct the assessment of Part ‘B’ i.e. Semester End Examination for Semesters V & VI.
The Internal Assessment marks of learners appearing for Semesters V & VI shall be submitted to the University by the respective colleges/Institutions before the commencement of respective Semester End
Examinations. The Semester End Examinations for Semesters V & VI shall be conducted by the University and the results shall be declared after processing the internal assessment and the marks awarded to the
learners. The grade card shall be issued by the University after converting the marks into grades.

THE MARKS OF THE INTERNAL ASSESSMENT SHOULD NOT BE DISCLOSED TO THE STUDENTS TILL THE RESULTS OF THE CORRESPONDING SEMESTER IS DECLARED.

R.8436 : PASSING STANDARD AND PERFORMANCE GRADING:

PASSING STANDARD
The learners to pass a course shall have to obtain a minimum of 40% marks in aggregate for each course where the course consists of Internal Assessment & Semester End Examination. The learners shall obtain a
minimum of 40% marks (i.e. 16 out of 40) in the Internal Assessment and 40% marks in Semester End Examination (i.e. 24 Out of 60) separately, to pass the course and a minimum of Grade E in each project,
wherever applicable, to pass a particular semester. A learner will be said to have passed the course if the learner passes the Internal Assessment & Semester End Examination together.

PERFORMANCE GRADING:
The PERFORMANCE GRADING of the learners shall be on the SEVEN point ranking system as under:

Grade Marks Grade Points
O 70 & above 7
A 60 to 69.99 6
B 55 to 59.99 5
C 50 to 54.99 4
D 45 to 49.99 3
E 40 to 44.99 2
F (Fail) 39.99 & below 1

The performance grading shall be based on the aggregate performance of Internal Assessment and Semester End Examination.


R.8437 : CARRY FORWARDS OF MARKS IN CASE OF A LEARNER WHO FAILS IN THE INTERNAL ASSESSMENT AND/OR SEMESTER END ASSESSMENT IN ONE OR MORE SUBJECTS:

1) A learner who PASSES in the Internal Examination but FAILS in the Semester End Examination of the course shall reappear for the Semester End Examination of that course. However, his/her marks of the
Internal Examinations shall be carried over, and he/she shall be entitled to the grade obtained by him/her on passing.

2) A learner who PASSES in the Semester End Examination but FAILS in the Internal Assessment of the course shall reappear for the Internal Examination of that course. However, his/her marks of the Semester End
Examination shall be carried over, and he/she shall be entitled to the grade obtained by him/her on passing.

3) A) For Courses without practical (for Faculty of Arts, Commerce & Science including Foundation Course Paper I & II)
In the case of a learner who is reappearing for the Internal Examination, the examination will consist of one project of 40 marks, which will be divided into 20 marks for the documentation of the project, 10
marks for the presentation, and 10 marks for the viva and the interaction.

B) For Courses with practical/fieldwork (for Arts & Commerce Faculty)
In the case of a learner who is reappearing for the Internal Examination for subjects with Practical/fieldwork, the examinations will consist of a practical examination of 40 marks, which will be divided into
20 marks for the laboratory work, 10 marks for the Viva Examination, and 10 marks for the Journal.

For courses with practical for the program under Faculty of Science, In case of learners who are reappearing for the internal Assessment of the Practical Course, the internal assessment will consist of one
project of 40 marks, which will be divided into 20 marks for the documentation of the project, 10 marks for the presentation, and 10 marks for the viva and the interaction. The marks thus obtained out of 40
will be converted to marks out of 20 (marks in decimal after conversion will be moved to the next integer).

R.8438 ALLOWED TO KEEP TERMS (ATKT):
a. A learner shall be allowed to keep term for Semester II irrespective of the number of heads of failure in Semester I.
b. A learner shall be allowed to keep term for Semester III if he/she passes each of Semester I and Semester II OR A learner who fails in not more than two courses of Semester I and Semester II taken together.
c. A learner shall be allowed to keep term for Semester IV irrespective of the number of heads of failure in Semester III. However, the learner shall pass each course of Semester I and Semester II in order to
appear for Semester IV.
d. A learner shall be allowed to keep term for Semester V if he/she passes Semester I, Semester II, Semester III, and Semester IV OR A learner shall pass Semester I and Semester II and fails in not more than
two courses of Semester III and Semester IV taken together.
e. A learner shall be allowed to keep term for Semester VI irrespective of the number of heads of failure in Semester V. However, the learner shall pass each course of Semester III and Semester IV in order to
appear for Semester VI.
f. The result of Semester VI shall be kept in abeyance until the learner passes each of Semester I, Semester II, Semester III, Semester IV, and Semester V.

R. 8439 ADDITIONAL EXAMINATION:

INTERNAL ASSESSMENT:

Eligibility norms to appear for the additional class test or assignment or project for learners who remained absent:

a. The learner must apply to the Head of the Institution giving the reason(s) for absence within 8 days of the conduct of the examination along with the necessary documents and testimonials.
b. If the learner is absent for participation in Inter Collegiate events, State or National or International level events, Training camp or coaching camp organized by authorized university or state or national
or international bodies, NSS / NCC Events / Camps / cultural activities / sports activities / research festival or any other activities authenticated by the head of the institution, the head of the Institution
shall generally grant permission to the learner to appear for the additional class test or assignment.
c. The Head of the Institution, on scrutiny of the documents and testimonials, may grant the permission to the learner to appear for the additional examination.

Class test or assignment for Internal Assessment for courses without practical: (for Commerce Faculty):
a. A learner who is absent for the two class test and the assignment will be declared fail in the Internal Assessment Scheme.
b. A learner who is absent for the two class tests and has appeared for the assignment will be allowed to appear for the additional class test of 10 marks. However, his marks for the class test will be taken
as out of 20. However, his marks for the class tests will be taken as out of 20, i.e. he/she will forfeit his/her 10 marks of one class test (without conversion i.e. if the learner gets 4/10 marks in his
additional class test, his/her marks for the class tests will be taken as 4/20), and internal assessment will be calculated as out of 40 marks and not 30 marks.
c. A learner who has appeared for both the class test but remains absent for the assignment will be allowed to appear for the additional assignment, and the internal assessment will be calculated as out of 40
marks.
d. A learner who is absent for one of the two class tests and is also absent for the assignment will be allowed to appear for one additional class test OR one additional assignment, as per the selection of the
student (to be given in writing to the Principal / Head of the Institution). The student will forfeit his or her 10 marks for one of the class tests/assignment, and the internal assessment will be calculated
as out of 40 marks and not 30 marks.
e. A learner who is absent for one of the two class tests/assignment, as the case may be, will be allowed to appear for one additional class test/one additional assignment, and the internal assessment will be
calculated as out of 40 marks.


Class test or assignment for Internal Assessment (for Arts & Science Faculty):
a. A learner who is absent for the class test and for all the assignments will be declared fail in the Internal Assessment Scheme.
b. A learner who is absent for the class test and has appeared for all the assignments will be allowed to appear for the additional class test of 10 marks.
c. A learner who has appeared for the class test but remains absent for all the assignments will be allowed to appear for only one additional assignment out of 10 marks. The student will forfeit 10 marks for
one assignment, and the internal assessment will be calculated as out of 40 marks.
d. A learner who is absent for the class test or one assignment, as the case may be, will be allowed to appear for the additional class test/assignment, and the internal assessment will be calculated as out of
40 marks.

Class test or assignment for Internal Assessment (for Foundation Course I & II for the Faculty of Arts & Science):
a. A learner who is absent for the class test and has submitted the assignment/project as per the schedule will be allowed to appear for the Semester End Examination. However, his/her marks for the class test
will be forfeited, and the internal assessment will be calculated as out of 40 marks.
b. A learner who has appeared for the class test but fails to submit the assignment/project or remains absent for the assignment/project will be allowed to submit an additional assignment/project for 20 marks,
and the Internal Assessment will be calculated out of 40 marks.


Class test or assignment for Internal Assessment for Courses with practical:
a. A learner who is absent for the Semester End Practical Examination and the assignment/project will be declared fail in the Internal Assessment Scheme.
b. A learner who is absent for the Semester End Practical Examination and has appeared for the assignment will be awarded marks for the Journal (out of 5 marks) & Viva (out of 5 marks) component of the
Semester End Examination. Thus, he will be evaluated for 10 marks instead of 20 marks and will lose the 10 marks for the Laboratory work. However, his marks for the Semester End Practical Examination will be
taken as out of 20 (without conversion i.e. if the learner gets 4/10 marks for Journal & Viva, his/her marks for the Semester End Practical Examination will be taken as 4/20), and internal assessment will be
calculated as out of 40 marks and not 30 marks.
c. A learner who is absent for one of the two class tests and is also absent for the assignment, the learner will be allowed to appear for one additional class test OR one additional assignment as per the
selection of the student (to be given in writing to the Principal / Head of the Institution) i.e. the student will forfeit his or her 10 marks of one of the class test / assignment as the case may be and the
internal assessment will be calculated as out of 40 marks and not 30 marks.
d. A learners who is absent for one of the two class tests /assignment as the case may be the learner will be allowed to appear for one additional class test/one additional assignment and the internal assessment will be calculated as out of 40 marks.

The Additional Class Test (or viva examination) or Assignment must be conducted 15 days prior to the commencement of the Semester End Examination after following the necessary procedure and completing the
formalities.

SEMESTER END EXAMINATIONS

ELIGIBILITY TO APPEAR FOR ADDITIONAL SEMESTER END EXAMINATION:
A learner who does not appear i.e. remains absent in some or all the courses on medical grounds or for representing the college / university in sports, cultural activities, activities of NSS, NCC or sports
training camps conducted by recognized bodies / competent authorities or for any other reason which is considered valid under exceptional circumstances and to the satisfaction of the Principal or the Head of
the Institute OR fails n some or all the subjects is eligible to appear for the additional examination.

A learner who does not appear for both the Internal Assessment and Semester End Examination shall not be eligible to appear for the additional Semester End Examination.

The additional Semester End Examination shall be of two hours duration and of 60 marks per course. The learner shall appear for the course of the Semester End Examination for which he/she was absent or has
failed. Learners who are punished under O.5050 are not eligible to appear for this additional examination.

MODE OF CONDUCT OF SEMESTER END ADDITIONAL EXAMINATION:
a) There will be one additional examination for semester I, II, III and IV for those who have failed or remained absent.
b) The absent learner will be allowed to appear for the examination by the head of the institution after following the necessary formalities subject to the reasons to the satisfaction of the head of the
institution.
c) This examination will be held 20 days after the declaration of results but not later than 40 days.

PROJECT EVALUATION (IF APPLICABLE)
1. A learner who PASSES IN ALL THE COURSES BUT DOES NOT secures minimum grade of E in project as applicable has to resubmit a fresh project till he/she secures a minimum of grade E.
2. The credits and grade points secured by him/her in the other courses will be carried forward and he/she shall be entitled for grade obtained by them on passing of all the courses.
3. The evaluation of project and viva/voce examination shall be done by marks only and then it will be converted into grade in the seven point scale and award the same to the learner.
4. A learner shall have to obtain minimum of grade E (or its equivalent marks) in project evaluation and viva/voce taken together to obtain 40% marks in project work.


R. 8440: Grade cum Marks cards: The result gazette and the format of the Grade Cards for the semesters conducted by colleges on behalf of the University will be uniform for all the Colleges / Institutions as
indicated in the manual for the faculty.

R. 8441: Course wise, Semester wise Credit allocation:

R. 8442 Format of Grade Card (Format of the Grade Cards with example are attached herewith)

Faculty
- Arts (for BA Program only)
  - Sem I: 15 Credits
  - Sem II: 15 Credits
  - Sem III: 22 Credits
  - Sem IV: 22 Credits
  - Sem V: 22 Credits
  - Sem VI: 24 Credits
  - Total Credits: 120

- Science (for all courses)
  - Sem I: 20 Credits
  - Sem II: 20 Credits
  - Sem III: 20 Credits
  - Sem IV: 20 Credits
  - Sem V: 20 Credits
  - Sem VI: 20 Credits
  - Total Credits: 120

- Bachelor of Commerce (B.Com.)
  - Sem I: 20 Credits
  - Sem II: 20 Credits
  - Sem III: 17 Credits
  - Sem IV: 17 Credits
  - Sem V: 23 Credits
  - Sem VI: 23 Credits
  - Total Credits: 120

- Bachelor of Management Studies (BMS)
  - Sem I: 21 Credits
  - Sem II: 21 Credits
  - Sem III: 18 Credits
  - Sem IV: 18 Credits
  - Sem V: 21 Credits
  - Sem VI: 21 Credits
  - Total Credits: 120

- Bachelor of Commerce (Accounting & Finance)(BAF)
  - Sem I: 21 Credits
  - Sem II: 21 Credits
  - Sem III: 21 Credits
  - Sem IV: 21 Credits
  - Sem V: 18 Credits
  - Sem VI: 18 Credits
  - Total Credits: 120

- Bachelor of Commerce (Banking & Insurance)(BBI)
  - Sem I: 18 Credits
  - Sem II: 18 Credits
  - Sem III: 21 Credits
  - Sem IV: 21 Credits
  - Sem V: 21 Credits
  - Sem VI: 21 Credits
  - Total Credits: 120

- Bachelor of Commerce (Financial Markets)(BFM)
  - Sem I: 18 Credits
  - Sem II: 18 Credits
  - Sem III: 21 Credits
  - Sem IV: 21 Credits
  - Sem V: 21 Credits
  - Sem VI: 21 Credits
  - Total Credits: 120

R. 8443 GRACING: The gracing shall be carried out as per existing ordinances of the University in force.

R. 8444 Question Papers Pattern:
1. The question papers shall be set and assessed by the teacher, teaching the course. If the course is taught by more than one teacher, the question paper shall preferably be set jointly, and assessment of the
sections/questions shall be done by the respective teacher.
2. The College authorities may request the teachers from other institutes teaching the course to set the question paper and/or assess the answer papers. However, for such actions, the university authorities
may seek proper reasons and justifications from the concerned Head of the Institute.
3. The question paper set by the college in different courses shall be forwarded to the University within 15 days of the declaration of the results for the semester for being placed before the respective Board
of Studies, which shall report their observations to the Academic Council and inform the observations of the Board and the Academic Council to the concerned colleges.

R. 8445 Centralised Assessment: The entire work of assessment of the answer papers at the Semester End Examinations shall be centralized within the premises of the concerned college as per the provisions of
the University Act and shall be open to inspection by the University. The College can appoint a Committee of 5 members to plan and conduct the CAP Center to ensure smooth, efficient and effective conduct of
CAP and Completion of the Assessment.

R. 8446 Moderation: The norms for moderation shall be as per the existing ordinances of the University in force.

R. 8447 Verification and Revaluation: Shall be as per the existing ordinances and regulation & VCD of the University.

R. 8448 Ex-student: Learners who are declared failed in one or more courses on account of failure at the Internal Assessment and/or Semester End Examinations or who have been allowed to keep terms for the
higher class shall appear as ex-students for the Internal Assessment and/or the Semester End Examination in the failed course at the examinations held by their respective college. Examinations for the ex
students will be held at least 15 days prior to the Semester End Examination of the next Semester as per the pattern of the course in the respective (failed) semester, e.g., for a student who fails in the
semester-end examination in the subject of Foundation Course paper I in Semester I, the examination for FC paper I of semester I shall be held at least 15 days prior to the conduct of the Semester End
Examination for Semester II. The examinations for the ex-students shall be held in every semester.


R. 8449 College Examination Committee:
The College Examination Committee shall consist of not more than 10 members, nominated by the Principal/Head of the Institute. One of the members shall be the Chairman of the Committee. The Committee will act
as the custodian and shall be In-charge of all the matters pertaining to the Internal Assessment, Semester End Examination of regular as well as ex-students for all the examinations at Semester I to IV and for
the Internal Assessment for Semester V and VI, including preparation of the timetable, setting of the question paper, arrangement for assessment of the answer books, the declaration of the results, attending
to and resolving the grievances/queries of the learners which are not part of the Unfair Means Inquiry Committee, keeping records of the assessment of all the assessments and examinations, scrutiny of the
students eligible to appear for the additional examination, and any other matter pertaining to the conduct of the additional and examination for the ex-students. The committee shall work as per the rules &
regulation of the University and under the superintendent of the Principal/Head of the Institution but as per the direction of University Examination authority from time to time.

R. 8450 College Unfair Means Inquiry Committee:
The College Unfair Means Inquiry Committee shall be constituted as per the prevailing ordinances of the University. The term of the committee shall be for five years subject to the provision of Section 42 and
43 of the Maharashtra Universities Act. The proceedings and working of the committee shall be maintained in the form of documents and minutes.

R. 8451 Sets of Question papers:
Three different sets of question papers shall be drawn with the model answer paper and assessment scheme per course for every Semester End Examination, one of which shall be used for the regular examination,
the second set can be used for the additional examination, and the third set can be used for the examination for the ex-student. Similarly, two sets of question papers shall be drawn for every test/assignment
conducted per course, one of which shall be used for the examination and the other for the additional examination.

R. 8452 Remuneration to Paper Setters/Examiners/Teaching and Non-Teaching Staff:
The remuneration payable to the paper setters and examiners will be as prescribed by the University Statute 482-A from time to time. The remuneration payable to the teaching and non-teaching staff appointed
for the conduct of the examinations will be as per the rates prescribed by the University for the conduct of the Third Year Examinations by the University in the concerned faculty.


UNIVERSITY OF MUMBAI Ordinances for Bachelor of Engineering (B. E.) Full Time Degree course with Credit Based Grading System (CBGS) for Rev – 2012 syllabus effective from A. Y. 2012-2013

The revised curriculum and credit based grading system are implemented for the Bachelor of Engineering program in the University of Mumbai from the academic year 2012-2013. In view of this, it is essential to
modify and amend the regulations applicable to the Bachelor of Engineering program, and these are as given below as ordinances:

ORDINANCES RELATED TO ADMISSION:

0.6242: A learner who has passed Semester I and Semester II examinations of engineering will be permitted to enter upon the program for Semester III of the second year of engineering. However, a learner who
has failed in not more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester I and Semester II considered together, will also be permitted to enter upon the
program for Semester III of the second year of engineering.

0.6243: A learner who has passed Semester I to Semester IV examinations will be permitted to enter upon the program for Semester V of the third year of engineering. However, a learner who has failed in not
more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester III and Semester IV considered together, will also be permitted to enter upon the program for
Semester V of the third year of engineering, provided he/she has passed Semester I and Semester II examinations of the first year of engineering.

0.6244: A learner who has passed Semester I to Semester VI examinations will be permitted to enter upon the program for Semester VII of the final year of engineering. However, a learner who has failed in not
more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester V and Semester VI considered together, will also be permitted to enter upon the program for
Semester VII of the final year of engineering, provided he/she has passed all examinations up to and including Semester IV.

0.6245: Notwithstanding anything contained in 0.3711R and 0.3712R, a learner who has satisfactorily kept term for semester VI of the Third Year Production Engineering program shall be deemed eligible to
undergo training in industry if arranged during semester VII of the final year of engineering. However, he/she will be eligible to join semester VIII of the program provided he/she has failed in not more than
eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester V and Semester VI considered together, and has passed all examinations up to and including semester IV
previously. The word ‘previously’ refers to semester I, Semester II, Semester III, and Semester IV examinations conducted no later than the first half of the year or training.

ORDINANCES RELATED TO EXAMINATION:

0.6246: Internal Assessment, End semester examination, Practical and/or oral will be considered as separate Heads of passing prescribed in the scheme of instructions and examinations. Term Work is not a
separate head of passing; however, a learner is eligible to appear for any form of examination only after satisfactorily completing Term Work in all courses of a particular semester as per the scheme of
instructions and examinations.

0.6247: A learner for being eligible to appear for semester III of the second year Engineering Examination should have satisfactorily kept the term for semester III and passed in semester I and Semester II
examination. However, a learner who has failed in not more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester I and Semester II considered together, will
also be permitted to appear for semester III examination.

0.6248: A learner for being eligible to appear for semester IV of the second year Engineering examination should have satisfactorily kept the term for semester IV and passed all examinations up to semester
III. However, a learner who has failed in not more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester I, Semester II considered together, and kept the
terms for semester III will also be permitted to appear for semester IV examination.

0.6249: A learner for being eligible to appear for semester V of the third year Engineering Examination should have satisfactorily kept the term for semester V and passed all examinations up to semester IV.
However, a learner who has failed in not more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester III and Semester IV considered together, will also be
permitted to appear for semester V examination.

0.6250: A learner for being eligible to appear for semester VI of the Third Year Engineering Examination should have satisfactorily kept the term for semester VI and passed all examinations up to semester V.
However, a learner who has failed in not more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester III and Semester IV considered together, and kept the
term for semester V will also be permitted to appear for semester VI examination.

0.6251: A learner for being eligible to appear for semester VII of the Final Year Engineering examination should have satisfactorily kept the term for Semester VII and passed all examinations up to semester
VI. However, a learner who has failed in not more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester V and Semester VI considered together, will also be
permitted to appear for semester VII examination.

0.6252: A learner for being eligible to appear for semester VIII of the Final Year Engineering Examination should have satisfactorily kept the term for semester VIII and passed all examinations up to semester
VII. However, a learner who has failed in not more than eight heads of passing, of which not more than five shall be in End Semester Examinations of Semester V and Semester VI considered together, and kept the
term for semester VII will also be permitted to appear for semester VIII examination.

0.6253: To pass in the individual courses of semester I to VIII examinations of first to the final year of engineering, a learner must obtain a minimum of 40% of the full marks. The minimum of 40% of the full
marks must be obtained in the Internal Assessment, End semester examination, practical, and oral examination separately in each course as applicable. Or A learner also passes in individual courses even if he
she fails in Internal Assessment but secures more than 50% in total (Internal Assessment + End Semester Examination) in that course.

0.6254: A learner who fails in an examination but secures a minimum of 40% of the marks assigned to the Internal Assessment, End semester examination, practical, and/or oral examination in a course will, at
his/her option, be exempted from reappearing in the Internal Assessment, End semester examination, practical, and/or oral examination in that course. The marks secured by such a learner in the Internal
Assessment, End semester examination, practical, and/or oral examination will be carried forward to the subsequent examination at which he/she reappears.


0.6255: Credit (C) for a course is dependent on the number of hours of instruction per week in that course and is obtained by using a multiplier of one (1) for lecture and tutorial hours, and a multiplier of
half (1/2) for laboratory hours. The minimum credit required for the award of a B.E. degree is 180.

0.6256: Rating of learner’s performance in a theory course should be done by using various modes of assessment, which mainly include Internal Assessment and End Semester Examination. The relative weightage for
Internal Assessment is typically 20 per cent. This will consist of two class tests. The relative weightage for the end semester examination is 80%, and will be held as per the university schedule. The end
semester examination is mandatory.

0.6257: A learner is awarded a letter grade in every course, based on the combined performance in all assessments in a particular semester as per the scheme of instructions and examinations of the respective
program. These letter grades not only indicate a qualitative assessment of the learner’s performance but also carry a quantitative (numeric) equivalent called the Grade Point. The letter grades and their
equivalent grade points applicable for undergraduate programs are as below:

Percentage of Marks Obtained | Letter Grade | Grade Points | Performance
------------------------------|--------------|--------------|-------------
80.00 and above               | O            | 10           | Outstanding
75.00 – 79.99                 | A            | 9            | Excellent
70.00 – 74.99                 | B            | 8            | Very Good
60.00 – 69.99                 | C            | 7            | Good
50.00 – 59.99                 | D            | 6            | Fair
45.00 – 49.99                 | E            | 5            | Average
40.00 – 44.99                 | P            | 4            | Pass
Less than 40.00               | F            | 0            | Fail

0.6258: The grade for theory courses can be awarded only after the successful completion of both Internal Assessment and End Semester Examination of the respective course as per the scheme of instructions and
examinations of the respective program.



0.6259:
If a learner remains absent in any form of evaluation/examination, the letter grade allocated to them should be "AB," and the corresponding grade point is zero. The learner should reappear for the said evaluation/examination in due course.

0.6260:
The performance of a learner in a semester is indicated by a number called Semester Grade Performance Index (SGPI). The SGPI is the weighted average of the grade points obtained in all the courses by the
learner during the semester. For example, if a learner passes five courses (Theory/labs./Projects/Seminar, etc.) in a semester with credits C1, C2, C3, C4, and C5, and learners grade points in these courses
are G1, G2, G3, G4, and G5 respectively, then the learner's SGPI is equal to:
SGPI=(C1×G1+C2×G2+C3×G3+C4×G4+C5×G5)(C1+C2+C3+C4+C5)SGPI=(C1+C2+C3+C4+C5)(C1×G1+C2×G2+C3×G3+C4×G4+C5×G5)​
The SGPI is calculated to two decimal places. The SGPI for any semester will take into consideration the "F or AB" grade awarded in that semester. For example, if a learner has failed in course 4, the SGPI
will then be computed as:

0.6261:
A learner's up-to-date assessment of the overall performance from the time they entered the program is obtained by calculating a number called the Cumulative Grade Performance Index (CGPI), in a manner similar
to the calculation of SGPI. The CGPI considers all the courses mentioned in the scheme of instructions and examinations, towards the minimum requirement of the degree the learner has enrolled for. The CGPI is
calculated at the end of every semester up to two decimal places and is indicated in semester grade report cards.
CGPI=∑i=1n(Ci×Gi)∑i=1nCiCGPI=∑i=1n​Ci​∑i=1n​(Ci​×Gi​)​
The CGPI will reflect the failed status in case of "F" grade(s), until the course(s) is/are passed. When the course(s) is/are passed by obtaining a pass grade on subsequent examination(s), the CGPI will only
reflect the new grade and not the fail grades earned earlier. Example: Up to semester "r," a learner has registered for n courses, among which s/he has "F" grade in the ith course. The semester grade report at
the end of semester r, therefore, will contain a CGPI calculated as:

Even if a learner has failed in a course more than once, the course will figure only once in the
numerator as well as the denominator. At the end of semester r+1 s/he has appeared for
examination for k number of courses including the ith backlog course and has cleared all the
courses including the backlog course, the CGPI at the end of this semester is calculated as:
\[ CGPI_{r+1} = \frac{\sum_{i=1}^{k} (C_i \times G_i)}{\sum_{i=1}^{k} C_i} \]
There will also be a final CGPI calculated which considers all the credits earned by the learner
specified for a particular programme.

0.6262:
A learner who has passed the Bachelor of Engineering degree examination of the university and
who wishes to improve their CGPI be permitted to appear again for the same examination with the
same courses. The learner may appear Semester VII and VIII together or separately but all
courses of semester VII together and all courses of semester VIII together without being required
to keep any term again. This provision shall be applicable subsequent to the first passing of the
degree examination for not more than three consecutive examinations conducted by the
University. Marks obtained by the candidate in term-work, internal assessment, practical and/or
oral examination, seminar and project of semester VII and semester VIII shall be carried forward
for not more than three consecutive examinations.

0.6263:
A learner who has passed the Bachelor of Engineering degree examination of the
university and wishes to improve CGPI at any point in time be permitted to appear again for the
existing examination with the available courses at that point in time. The learner may appear
Semester VII and VIII together or separately but all courses of semester VII together and all
courses of semester VIII together without being required to keep any term again. Marks obtained
by the candidate in term-work, internal assessment, practical and/or oral examination, seminar
and project of semester VII and semester VIII whichever applicable shall be carried forward.



University of Mumbai
INTER-COLLEGIATE CULTURAL COMPETITIONS
RULES & REGULATIONS

(a) Compulsion of representing the University: The Inter-Collegiate Competitions in various activities shall be held every year with a view to identify various talents amongst the students of all affiliated
colleges, recognized institutions and University Departments, who can thereby suitably be selected to represent the University at the State, Zonal and National level Cultural Competitions, as a continuous
process. This would also open the avenues for the students at appropriate levels and make avail of the right opportunities for expression of their talents. It is therefore obligatory on participants in the
Inter-Collegiate Cultural Competition/s organized by the University to make themselves available for the selection trials, rehearsals, workshops, performances and also for participation in various competitions
for representing the University in the same or any other suitable events or any accompanist/s, as and when required by the University, failing which their prize/s or certificate/s won at the said competition
s, if any, may be canceled and their performance at the said all the cultural competition/s conducted/organized by the University may be considered as null and void. Such student/s and or their college/s will
also be liable for/appropriate disciplinary action as decided by the authorities later on (since the intention of implementing this rule is to safeguard the interest of the University and inculcate a sense of
commitment to the institution among the students. The said rule may not be observed/omitted with prior intimation to the participating colleges, once the said objectives are achieved). Further, in this
connection, the University reserves the right to select any item from the Inter-Collegiate Competitions as a whole or a part thereof, whereby some of the participant/s, accompanist/s or even only the script
music and/or any technical part etc., shall be selected, as and when required for the said purpose, for which no honorarium/royalty can be expected by the concerned person/s college/s. It may also be noted
that by winning a prize at these Inter-collegiate Cultural Competitions one does not secure a place in the University contingent selected to represent the University at the Inter-University or such other
competition/s, since this selection, though based upon the performance of an individual in the Inter-Collegiate Competition, finalization of the Contingent is based on multidimensional suitability of each
individual.

(b) Teacher Co-ordinator: Every participating college/recognized institution, University Department must appoint at least one Teacher Co-ordinator who will be a teacher of the said affiliated college
recognized Institution/University Department. He/She shall maintain a liaison between the Director of Students’ Welfare/Honorary Cultural Co-ordinator of the University/Organizing Committee appointed by the
University and contingent of his/her college/recognized institution/University Department. He/She is expected to attend the meeting as and when called apart from accompanying the member/s of the contingent for
the competition/s. The name of the Teacher Co-ordinator/s Cultural Co-ordinator/s should be communicated every year to the University in a Proforma prescribed for the purpose, along with three envelopes
bearing residential address, one of which should be of the size of 21cms x 29cms. (Do not affix any postal stamps). There is no restriction on the number of Teacher Co-ordinators to be appointed by each
college/recognized institution/University Department, which may please be noted. Further, these teacher co-ordinators should be willing to work on the various committees of the University, constituted from
time to time, wherever appointed/nominated, with a view to reduce the burden on the University, by sharing some of the responsibilities assigned to them.

(c) Student Co-ordinator: Student Co-ordinator is expected to assist the Teacher Co-
ordinator of his/her college/recognized institution/ University Department and the
University for the smooth conduct of the cultural activities. Further, he/she is also
expected to volunteer to help the Director of Students’ Welfare / Honorary Cultural Co-
ordinator for organizing the contingent to be sent for the State/Zonal/National Level
Competitions. The Principals/Directors/ Head of the colleges/recognized institutions/
University Department are required to appoint at least two student Co-ordinators (one girl
and one boy) from each college. However, colleges/recognized institutions/University
Departments where co-education is not available, are required to seek prior permission of
appointing both/all the student co-ordinators of the same gender amongst their students
for the purpose. Name of the Student Co-ordinators are to be communicated every year in
the Proforma prescribed for the purpose, along with 3 envelopes bearing residential
address, one of which should be of the size of 21cms x 29cms.

(d) Accompanists, Back Stage Artists and Helpers: Accompanist/s, Back Stage Artist/s
and helper/s, wherever allowed in the event/s, included under Music, Dance and Theatre
Sections etc. should preferably be students. Outsiders will only be allowed in case
suitable students are not available. However, favorable consideration may be given to
the item where accompanist/s, backstage artist/s, helper/s are students.

(e) Eligibility: Participation in the competitions is open to all bonafide students of the
affiliated colleges/recognized institutions/University Departments of the University of
Mumbai. No student shall be eligible to participate in the competition/s if he/she has
completed 25 years of age on 1st September of the academic year. No student will be
allowed to participate if he/she is not admitted to the college for the current academic
year. No student will be allowed to participate if he/she is not admitted to the college for
the current academic year.

(f) Entry Fees: The entry fees for various individual/group event/s shall be declared from
time to time. The fee is to be paid by Demand draft/Cheque. The Demand Draft/cheque/s
for the consolidated entry fees for an individual/group event/s should be drawn in favor
of “Finance & Accounts Officer, University of Mumbai” and the cheque/s and the
consolidated entry forms are to be sent to the Director of Students’ Welfare,
Vidyapeeth Vidyarthi Bhavan, ‘B’ Road, Churchgate, Mumbai-400 020, so as to
reach this office on or before the last date announced from time to time for receiving the
same.

(g) Entry formalities: Following are the various types of forms to be filled and their formats are as shown in Appendices I, II, III & IV, which may please be used for sending the entries at various stages on or before the last dates for receiving the respective forms as notified from time to time.

Proforma – I
[Consolidated] entry form
Consolidated entry form to be accompanied by the entry fees, giving details and the respective centers for the purpose.

Proforma – II
[Language for Group ‘B’]
Form to be submitted subsequently, but before the last date fixed for the purpose, indicating the choice of languages wherever applicable.

Proforma–III (a)
[Detailed entry form for individual event]
To be submitted at the time of registration on the day of competition, giving details of the participant, accompanist/s and the item of individual event.

Proforma-III (b)
[Detailed entry form for Group event]
To be submitted at the time of registration on the day of competition, giving details of the participant/s, accompanist/s and the item of group event.

Proforma-III (c)
[For Jackpot event]
To be submitted either in the meeting convened for the purpose or on the day of the first event, giving details of the Jackpot participant.

Proforma-III (d) [for Versatility]
To be submitted at the time of registration on the day of competition, giving details of Versatility participant/s.

Proforma-IV (a)
[Deputation of Teacher Co-ordinator/s]
Proforma-IV (b)
[Deputation of student Co-ordinator/s]
To be submitted along-with the consolidated entry form, giving details of teacher/student Co-ordinator/s.

Proforma-V
[Undertaking of winners]
To be submitted by prize/merit certificate within 8 days from the declaration of the result of the competition, undertaking participation in Zonal/National level competitions and as a waiver of risk.

(h) Registration: Registration will be done on the day of the event/performance at the time and venue mentioned in the time-table. The participant/s, accompanist/s (if students) at the time of registration.
Registration may not be allowed after the time mentioned for the same and the participant/s of team/s may not be allowed to perform/participate in the said competition.

(i) Draws: The order of performance for various participants/teams in an event shall be determined by lots drawn at least two days before the event, at the respective centers Vidyapeeth Vidyarthi Bhavan
established for conducting elimination rounds. The drawing of lots shall be executed by the Director of Students’ Welfare, in his/her absence the Honorary Cultural Co-ordinator in the absence of whom, the
Chief Conductor of the events at the said center. None other than the Principal/Teacher Co-ordinator/s Students Co-ordinator/s of the participating colleges/recognized institutions/University Departments
shall
be allowed to be present at the time of drawing lots. The lots for the final rounds of various events shall be drawn at the Department of Students’ Welfare, at least two days before the commencement of the
competitions (Youth Festival). The draws for elimination rounds as well as final rounds will be displayed at the respective centers at least two days before the event. Any change in the order of performance
shall not be allowed after the lots are drawn. However, the participants/teams may apply for a change in the order of performance only by means of mutual exchange. Their permission for the same must be sought
in writing on the letter-head of the college/recognized Institutions/University Department, signed by the concerned Principal/Teacher Co-ordinator and consented to by the teacher Co-ordinator/Students’ Co
ordinator of the college/recognized institution/University Department with which mutual exchange is applied for, before the announcement of the concerned event. The decision regarding the grant of mutual
exchange shall be taken by the Director of Students Welfare/Honorary Cultural Co-ordinator/Chief Conductor of the event which shall be final and binding on all the participants/teams.

(j) Walk Overs: At the time of the competition, the participants/teams are required to be ready for the performance as per the order decided by draws. Any participant/team shall not be given more than three
calls for performance. The participant/team failing to appear for the performance after the third call may be given a walk-over for the said event, whereby they shall not be considered in the competition.
They
may also not be allowed to perform thereafter. In case of any dispute, the decision of the Director of Students’ Welfare, in the absence of whom, the Honorary Cultural Co-ordinator, in the absence of whom,
the
Chief Conductor of the events at the particular center, shall be final and binding on all the participants/teams.


GENERAL RULES
Cultural events of One-Act-Play, Skits, Mime, Indian Group Song, Fine Art at the Inter-Collegiate Competitions would require to display fundamental values of Indian Cultural heritage, oriented towards unity
and National integration, integrity, truth, devotion, loyalty and eradication of obscurantism, violence, obscenity superstition, fatalism and religious fatalism and for building the moral character of the
students and inculcating a sense of commitment to the society and nation.

1. Tabla, tanpura and harmonium may be provided by the University for al the events under Music Section, wherever available. However, the participants are required to confirm the same, well in advance before
the respective competition/s.
2. Five spot lights and general make-up facilities may normally be provided by the University, wherever available. For the events in Theatre and Dance Sections, alongwith general property such as a table and
four chairs/cubes. Participants are required to confirm the availability of the same, well in advance. Additional lights, property and special make-up should be arranged by the participants themselves at
their
own cost and risk. At elimination round theatre facilities will be provided as per the availability at the centres.
3. The participants are advised to take safety measures/care of their property, valuables, etc., during the performance or otherwise, in green room or on the premises of the competition. The University or any
concerned person shall not be responsible for the damage, loss or injury caused to property persons, directly or indirectly, during these competitions, under any circumstances whatsoever and that no
compensation/redressal shall be paid made.
4. No hazardous material, such as weapons inflammable/toxic chemicals/ materials will be permitted on the premises. However, in case it is an integral part for the performance, prior permission has to be
sought, well in advance, from the Director of Students’ Welfare/ Honorary Cultural Co-ordinator furnishing written details of the bonafide use of the materials mentioned above. Further, Director of Students’
Welfare/ Honorary Cultural Co-ordinator/Chief Conductor of the event reserve the right to stop the performance on the spot as a safety measure.
5. The audience is expected to carry college identity cards/entry passes/ tickets in order to seek entry in the auditorium/Hall. However, the organisers reserve the right to bar the entry or to expel anybody
out of the auditorium/hall if found guilty of any misconduct.
6. The events which are conducted in more than one group of Language viz. Group ‘A’, Group ‘B’ and Group ‘C’ shall be judged separately for each group and the winner for each group shall be entitled for
separate prizes and other benefits, if any. Besides, the appropriate points shall be added to the scores of the respective college/s, separately for such competition/s, in each group. It is obvious,
therefore,
that separate entry forms and entry fees are to be deposited for each group wherever participation is sought, since they are treated as independent competitions.

7. There may be an elimination round, either by audio/video/visual or live, for all/some of the events/competitions which may be conducted at all/some centres so announced by prior intimation. A maximum of
three participants/teams per event from each centre other than Mumbai will be selected for the final round on the basis of the standard of performance only if recommended by the judges. All such students
invited for the final round from Mumbai City, Mumbai Suburbs, and districts shall be eligible for the reimbursement of traveling allowance at a concessional rate for the shortest route claimed by the
respective colleges within fifteen (15) days after the respective competition/s and on producing the ticket/s and the relevant documents duly signed. Arrangement of accommodation and food for district (other
than Mumbai City and Mumbai Suburban) students shall be made by the University, free of charge, for the minimum required number of days when they have to stay in Mumbai for performing in the final round. In
case the same cannot be provided, the participant/s shall be entitled to claim D.A. from the office of the Director of Students’ Welfare, as may be made admissible from time to time. However, the University
does not hold responsibility for any loss or damage caused directly or indirectly during the journey or stay for these students, under any circumstances whatsoever, and that no compensation/redressal shall be
paid/made.
8. Entry on the stage, in the green room and in the area of the back stage is strictly restricted to the Teacher Co-ordinator, participant, accompanists/ back-stage artists/helpers only and the number of
which
should not exceed as specified for each event.
9. University reserves the right to cancel any event/centre or merge the participants of two or more centres if the number of entries are less than six in group events and ten in case of individual events, at
a particular centre/round.
10. At the end of the prescribed time for each event, a bell/signal will be given, declaring disqualification of the item. However, in the case of certain events a warning bell/signal may be given which will
be announced before the commencement of the event. Violation of the time limit shall lead to an immediate disqualification.
11. All the students who have been declared to have won any prize or certificate at these Inter-Collegiate Competitions, must submit an undertaking in the prescribed format signed by himself/herself and his
her parent/guardian, endorsed by the Principal/Director/Head, stating that he/she is ready to represent the University entirely at his/her own risk whenever required, either at Mumbai or outside Mumbai. Such
undertaking given as per proforma as Appendix V should reach the office of the Director of Students’ Welfare within eight days from the declaration of result for the said event at the competitions. They are
advised to submit two self-addressed envelopes bearing a postal stamp of Rs. 6/- to be used for further communication whenever required and also for sending an invitation to the Prize Distribution Function,
when organized.
12. Selection of the University contingent for Zonal/National level Inter-University Competitions or for any other competition/performance, shall normally be based on the result of the Inter-Collegiate
competitions. However, the authorized/competent body of the University, failing whom, the Director of Students’ Welfare, failing whom, the Honorary Cultural Co-Ordinator shall be empowered to select such
other
students/team, who in the opinion of the bodies/persons stated above, are more suitable for the said competition/s performance/s.

13. Decision of the judges concerning technicalities related to the performance shall be final and binding on all the participants. Merit certificates/consolation prizes, apart from the declared prizes, may
be
given only on the recommendation of the judges.
14. Violation of any rule may amount to disqualification of the concerned team. The final authority for making any decision in such cases will be with the University.
15. Student Co-Ordinator/Teacher Co-Ordinator are advised to seek clarification/explanation/interpretation/information of any of the rules or conduct of any of the events only from the Director of Students’
Welfare or from the Hon. Cultural Co-Ordinator of the University whenever necessary.
16. The college/Recog. Institution/University Department where co-education is not available, have to take prior permission from the Director of Students’ Welfare in order to depute students of the same
gender
for various competitions, in which boy and girl participants are otherwise required.


AWARDS
1. All students securing first, second, and third positions in the individual events shall be entitled to a merit certificate and Gold, Silver, and Bronze medals, respectively.
2. All students who have participated in the group events shall be entitled to receive a merit certificate along with Gold, Silver, and Bronze medals only if their item secures first, second, and third place,
respectively, in the said event/competition.
3. Apart from what is stated at Sr. No. 1 and Sr. No. 2, merit certificates/consolation prizes may be given to deserving students only on the recommendation of the judge in individual/group event/s, and cash
prize/s mementoes may also be given whenever available through sponsorship or otherwise.
4. Certificates of appreciation may be given to the Teacher Co-Ordinator and Student Co-Ordinator on the recommendation of the Director of Students’ Welfare for remarkable contributions in organizing
University Cultural Activities.
5. C. Ramchandra Cash Award: The student securing first and second positions in Light Vocal (solo) competition will be awarded a cash prize of Rs. 300/- and Rs. 200/-, respectively, in the name of Late Shri.
C.Ramchandra.
6. The title of “Mr. University” and “Miss. University” shall be bestowed upon the boy and the girl student securing first place in the event of “Jackpot,” respectively, providing their overall excellence.
7. The title of “The Artist of the Year” shall be bestowed upon the student securing first place in the Versatility contest as well as on the basis of his/her performance in the Zonal/National Competitions
organized by the Association of Indian Universities.
8. The students showing specific merit at the cultural competitions are entitled to 10 grace marks under 0.229-A only if the names are forwarded by the respective Principals/Director/Head in the format as
shown in Appendix IV within a week from the received confirmed examination seat number of such students. Student participants and student accompanists are entitled to get 10 grace marks if they secure first,
second, and third positions.
9. Contingent members representing the University at the National level shall be awarded a blazer with the University crest, on the recommendation of the Director of Students’ Welfare/Honorary Cultural Co
Ordinator.
10. The students/accompanists/team managers selected to represent the University at Zonal and National level competitions shall be entitled to admissible T.A/D.A and incidental charges.
11. All trophies announced and awarded either immediately after the declaration of the result or during the prize distribution function, won for various performances at the Inter-Collegiate Competitions are
the rotating trophies, and Principals/Director/Heads of the college or recognized institutions or University Departments shall be responsible to ensure that the same are received by the competent person/s and
are returned to the office of Director of Students’ Welfare in good shape and order at the end of the respective academic year.

RULES REGARDING CONDUCT OF VARIOUS CULTURAL COMPETITIONS
MUSIC SECTION

1. Indian Group Song [Group Event]
   a. Each participating College can depute a single group of singers not exceeding six students participants.
   b. Maximum of three accompanists will be allowed. However, singers may also play instruments while singing.
   c. Two group songs will be presented by each group, one of which shall be a folk song and the other should preferably be a patriotic one.
   d. The songs can be in any regional/official language/s of India, other than English.
   e. Film songs are not allowed under this item.
   f. The total duration of the performance including both the songs must not exceed ten minutes. The time computation shall start immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s.
   g. Three copies of the songs with their meaning written in Marathi or English [for the songs in the language other than Marathi or Hindi] must be submitted at the time of registration on the day of the
   competition.
   h. Synthesizer or any other electronic instruments/gadget shall be played only in one mode, if used.

2. Indian Light Vocal [Solo]
   a. Each participating College can depute only one student participant.
   b. Duration of the performance shall not exceed six minutes. The time computation shall start immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s.
   c. Maximum of two accompanists will be allowed. However, the singer himself/herself may also play an instrument.
   d. The songs can be in any regional/official language of India, other than English.
   e. Film songs are not allowed under this item.
   f. Three copies of the songs with their meaning written in Marathi or English [for the songs in the language other than Marathi or Hindi] must be submitted at the time of registration on the day of the
   competition.
   g. Synthesizer or any other electronic instrument/gadget shall be played only in one mode, if used.
   
3. Indian Classical Vocal [Solo]:
   a. Each participating College can depute only one student participant, either for Hindustani or Karnatic style.
   b. The duration of the performance shall not exceed Ten minutes for any style of performance. The time computation shall start immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s.
   c. Maximum of two accompanists will be allowed. The singer may use an instrument such as Tanpura, Electronic Tanpura, Violin, or Swarmandal.
   d. Film songs based on Classical style are not allowed under this Item.
   e. Three copies of the details regarding Raag, Taal, and Bandish written in Marathi or English must be submitted at the time of registration on the day of the competition.

4. Indian Classical Instrumental [Solo] [Non-percussion/Swarvadya]:
   a. Each participating College can depute only one student participant, either for Hindustani or Karnatic style.
   b. The duration of the performance shall not exceed Ten minutes for any style of performance. The time computation shall start immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s. Hence, the
   participants are advised to tune their instruments well in advance.

5. Indian Classical Instrumental [Solo] [Percussion/Taalvadya]:
   a. Each participating College can depute only one student participant, either for Hindustani or Karnatic style.
   b. The duration of the performance shall not exceed Ten minutes for any style of performance. The time computation shall start immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s. Hence, the
   participants are advised to tune their instruments well in advance.
   c. Only one accompanist shall be allowed.

6. Western Vocal [Solo]:
   a. Each participating College can depute only one student participant.
   b. The total duration of the performance shall not exceed six minutes. The time computation shall be computed immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s.
   c. Maximum of two accompanists will be allowed. However, the singer himself/herself may also play an instrument.
   d. The song may be in any language of the western countries.
   e. Three copies of the songs with their meaning written either in Marathi or English, must be submitted at the time of registration on the day of competition.
   f. Film songs are not allowed under this event.
   g. Synthesizer or any other electronic instrument/gadget shall be played only in one mode if used.

7. Western Group Song [Group Song]:
   a. Each participating College can depute only one group of singers having not more than six student-participants.
   b. The duration of the performance must not exceed ten minutes, which may include any number of songs. The time computation shall start immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s.
   c. Maximum of three accompanists are allowed. However, the singers also may play an instrument while singing.
   d. Three copies of the songs with its/their meaning written in Marathi or English [for the songs in the language other than English] must be submitted at the time of registration on the day of competition.
   e. Film songs are not allowed under this event.
   f. Synthesizer or any other electronic instrument/gadget shall be played only in one mode if used.

8. Western Instrument Music [Solo][Percussion/Non-percussion]:
   a. Each participating college can depute only one student participant.
   b. A participant shall play western music on any percussion or non-percussion instrument.
   c. The duration of the performance must not exceed ten minutes. The time computation shall start immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s.
   d. Maximum of two accompanists are allowed.
   e. Synthesizer or any other electronic instrument/gadget, as an accompaniment, shall be used only in one mode.

9. Folk Orchestra:
   a. Each participating College can depute only one team (nine participants).
   b. Maximum of three accompanists will be allowed who should be in different dress from the student participants so that they could be easily identified.
   c. They will sit/stand separately from the participants and will not lead the team.
   d. Duration of performance will be a minimum of seven and a maximum of 10 minutes.
   e. This does not include setting time, which shall not be more than 5 minutes.
   f. The team should present folk tunes that are originally from Maharashtra. The instruments played should be original for a particular folk and appropriate related to folk art in Maharashtra.


LITERARY SECTION

1. Short Story Writing [Individual Event]:
   a. The Story Writing competition will be held in two groups:
      Group ‘A’: In Marathi language and
      Group ‘B’: In any of the official languages of India, other than Marathi.
   b. Each participating college will depute one student participant in each group by filling separate entry forms for the two groups.
   c. The total duration will be two hours, during which the participant shall write a short story under the supervision of the officials.
   d. The subject for Short Story Writing will be announced at least one week before the date of the competition.
   e. Writing sheets will be provided by the University. Other materials, such as pen, pencil, etc., should be arranged by the participants themselves.
   f. No participant is allowed to carry any written or printed material at the time of the competition.

2. Elocution [Individual Event]:
   a. Separate competitions will be held in the following two groups:
      Group ‘A’: In Marathi language and
      Group ‘B’: In any of the official languages of India, other than Marathi.
   b. Each participating college will depute one student participant in each group by filling separate entry forms for the two groups.
   c. Each speaker will be allowed to speak for a maximum of five minutes.
   d. The topic for the competition for each group will be announced at least one week before the date of the competition.

3. Debate [Group Event]:
   a. Separate competitions will be held in the following two groups:
      Group ‘A’: In Marathi language and
      Group ‘B’: In any of the official languages of India, other than Marathi.
   b. Each participating college will depute two student debaters in each group by filling separate entries for the two groups.
   c. Each debater will be allowed to speak for a maximum of five minutes.
   d. The proposition for the debate will be announced at least one week before the date of the competition.
   e. The first student debater will speak “FOR” the proposition, and the second debater “AGAINST” the proposition, but in the same language.

4. Quiz [Group Event]:
   a. Each college can depute a team of three student participants only.
   b. There will be a written preliminary round in English, and a maximum of six teams will be selected on merit for the final round.
   c. A total of fifteen [15] minutes will be given to solve the objective type of questions.
   d. The final will be oral and may include audio-visual questions.
   e. The specific rules for the final round, regarding the evaluation system, time to replay a particular question, and the type of rounds shall be announced by the referee before the commencement of the
   competition.

DANCE SECTION

1. Indian Classical Dance [Individual Event]:
   a. Each participating University can depute only one student participant performing in one of the styles of Indian classical dance from the following namely: Kathak, Bharatnatyam, Mohini Attam, Kathakali,
   Odissy, Manipur, Kuchipudi.
   b. The total duration of the performance shall not exceed fifteen minutes. The time computation shall start as soon as music/announcement starts or curtain is fully open, whichever is earlier.
   c. Three copies of a brief note on the description of the dance story involved in accompanying song, if any, with its meaning must be submitted either in Marathi or in English at the time of registration
   on the day of the competition.
   d. A maximum of three accompanists will be allowed, which include singers, instrumentalists, light curtain operators, etc.
   e. Live accompaniment will be given due credit.
   f. Film songs based on classical style dances are not allowed.
   g. The rotating trophy viz. “Menaka Trophy” instituted for “Kathak” and “Guru A.T. Govindraj Pillai Memorial Rolling Trophy” for “Bharatnatyam” will be awarded only on specific recommendation of the
   judges. Winning the first rank among the participants does not entitle the participant/college to these trophies, and hence no points shall be added specifically to the scores of the colleges whose
   participants win these trophies.

2. Folk Dance [Group Event]:
   a. Each participating College can depute a single group not exceeding 10 student participants.
   b. A maximum of five accompanists/back-stage artists/helpers will be allowed.
   c. The dance should either be a tribal or a folk dance preferably from the Folk Dances of Maharashtra and should not be a classical dance.
   d. The total duration of dance performance should not exceed ten minutes. The time computation shall start as soon as music/announcement starts or curtain is fully open, whichever is earlier.
   e. It will be the responsibility of the participating College to remove their sets, property, etc., within five minutes after their performance is over.
   f. Three copies of a brief note either in Marathi or in English giving details of the type/style of dance and the text meaning of the song, if any, should be submitted at the time of registration on the
   day of the competition.
   g. Live accompaniment will be given due credit.


THEATRE SECTION

1. Mono Acting [Individual Event]:
   a. Each participating college can depute only one student participant in each group by filling a separate entry form for the two groups.
   b. The mono-acting competition will be held in two groups:
      - Group ‘A’: In Marathi language
      - Group ‘B’: In any of the official languages of India, other than Marathi
   c. The total duration of the performance shall not exceed seven minutes in each group. The time shall be computed as soon as the performance starts.
   d. Three copies of the script with an explanatory note on the theme, either in Marathi or in English language, must be submitted at the time of registration on the day of the competition.
   e. Costumes/make-up are allowed. However, only acting skills will be adjudged for the prize.

2. Mime:
   a. Each participating college will depute only one team consisting of a minimum of four and a maximum of six student participants.
   b. The total duration of the performance shall not exceed five minutes.
   c. It is desirable to perform with a plain, dark background on the stage and to have white skin-tight dress for the participants, besides making their faces with white make-up, dark eye liners, dark raised
   eyebrows, and broadened lips with red lipstick.
   d. Since importance shall be given to conveying a concept purely through expressions and gestures only, the use of any property is not allowed. However, the use of music may be permitted to strengthen the
   performance.
   e. A maximum of two accompanists/backstage artists are allowed.
   f. Normally five spot-lights and general make-up facilities are provided by the University. Other additional lights/special make-up should be arranged by the participants themselves at their own cost and
   risk.

3. Skit [Group Event]:
   a. The Skit competition will be held in two groups:
      - Group ‘A’: In Marathi language
      - Group ‘B’: In any regional/official language of India, other than Marathi.
   b. The skit should preferably highlight an issue of national/social importance.
   c. Each participating college can depute two teams, one in each group by filling separate entry forms for each group. Teams consisting of a minimum of four and a maximum of six students-participants.
   d. A maximum of three accompanists/backstage artists/workers/helpers shall be allowed under this event.
   e. The total duration of the performance shall not exceed ten minutes in each group. The time computed as soon as the announcement starts or the curtain is fully open, whichever is earliest.
   f. Use of make-up, drapery, and background music is allowed under this item.
   g. Three copies of the script with a note on the theme, explained either in Marathi or in English language, must be submitted at the time of registration on the day of the competition.
   h. No skit shall be repeated by any college in consecutive Inter-Collegiate Competitions.
   i. Skits should possess an acceptable level of decency, failing which, the item may be disqualified.

4. One-Act-Play [Group Event]:
   a. The number of student-participants in any one-act-play shall not exceed nine.
   b. The One-Act-Play competition will be held in two groups:
      - Group ‘A’: In Marathi language
      - Group ‘C’: In any regional/official language of India, other than Marathi.
   c. The total duration of each play shall not exceed thirty minutes. The time computation shall start as soon as the announcement starts or the curtain is fully open, whichever is earliest.
   d. For setting and dismantling the set/lighting arrangements, a time period of 10 minutes before the play and 5 minutes after the play shall be granted.
   e. The play can be in prose or in verse.
   f. Each participating college can depute two teams, one in each group by filling separate entry forms for each group.
   h. Three copies of script with its theme, explained either in Marathi or in English,
      must be submitted at the time of registration on the day of competition.
   i. Maximum of three accompanists/back stage artists/workers/helpers shall be
      allowed under this event.
   j. It will be solely the responsibility of the participating College to see that the script
      is duly censored.
   k. No play shall be repeated by same college in consecutive Inter-Collegiate
      Competitions.
   l. Obtaining all sorts of required permission, censor certificates etc., shall be the
      responsibility of the participating College.
5. Mimicry:
   a. Each participating College can depute only one student participant.
   b. The duration of the performance shall not exceed five minutes. The time computation shall start immediately after the final announcement by the organizer/s. Violation of the time limit will disqualify
   the participant.
   c. Mimicry event can be done in any regional language in India, or the sound of machines and speeches of well-known personalities.
   d. Props, Costumes, and makeup, if used and proper, are necessary and will be allowed.
   e. At the time of registration, the character the participant is going to imitate should be specified and handed over at the counter.
   f. No declaration of the character on stage is allowed.
   
   
FINE ART SECTION

1. On the Spot Painting [Individual Event]
   a. Each participant College can depute only one student participant.
   b. This competition will be conducted ‘On the Spot,’ and participants are required to paint on the subject given by the panel of judges at the time of the competition.
   c. The total duration for completing the painting shall not exceed two hours and thirty minutes.
   d. The size of the paper shall be half imperial size drawing paper, i.e., 22 inches in length and 15 inches in breadth.
   e. Painting should be done either in watercolors or in poster colors only.
   f. Drawing paper will be provided by the University. Other required material should be arranged by the participants themselves.

2. Collage [Individual Event]
   a. Each participant College can depute only one student participant.
   b. This competition will be conducted ‘On the Spot,’ and participants are required to create a collage on the subject given by the panel of judges at the time of the competition.
   c. The total duration for completing the painting shall not exceed two hours and thirty minutes.
   d. The paper and magazines provided by the University should be used. However, participants should bring their own pair of scissors, gum, and other required material.

3. Poster-Making [Individual Event]
   a. Each participant's college can depute only one student participant.
   b. This competition will be conducted ‘On the Spot,’ and participants are required to make a poster on the subject given by the panel of judges at the time of the competition.
   c. The total duration for completing the poster shall not exceed two hours and thirty minutes.
   d. Drawing paper will be provided by the University. Other required material should be arranged by the participants themselves.

4. Cartooning [Individual Event]
   a. Each participant College can depute only one student participant.
   b. This competition will be conducted ‘On the Spot,’ and participants are required to do the cartooning on the subject given by the panel of judges at the time of the competition.
   c. The total duration for completing the cartoon shall not exceed two hours and thirty minutes.
   d. Only paper will be provided by the University. Other required material should be arranged by the participants themselves.

5. Rangoli [Individual Event]
   a. Each participant College can depute only one student participant.
   b. This competition will be conducted ‘On the Spot,’ and participants are required to draw rangoli on the project given by the panel of judges at the time of the competition.
   c. The total duration for completing the rangoli shall not exceed two hours and thirty minutes.
   d. A space admeasuring 120cmX 120cm will be provided to each participant.
   e. Rangoli should be done in rangoli powder only.
   f. All other required material should be arranged by the participants themselves. However, the use of any reference such as greetings or printed material/picture, in miniature form or otherwise, should be
   avoided.

6. Clay-Modelling [Individual Event]
   a. Each participant's College can depute only one student participant.
   b. This competition will be conducted ‘On the Spot,’ and participants are required to do the Clay modeling on the subject given by the panel of judges at the time of the competition.
   c. The total duration for completing the painting shall not exceed two hours and thirty minutes.
   d. The clay will be provided by the University. However, participants can use their own clay with the prior permission of the judges.
   e. Other implements should be arranged by the participants themselves.

7. Spot Photography
   a. A College/Institution can send one participant.
   b. The participant has to bring his/her own digital camera of not more than 12 megapixels.
   c. The digital camera should have a memory card which will be formatted by the judges before the commencement of the contest.
   d. The time limit will be 2.30 hours.
   e. The participant has to produce only the best 5 photographs on the theme announced on the spot by judges.
   f. No mixing, matching, or morphing of photographs will be permitted.
   g. Software such as Photoshop etc. for enhancing images is not permitted.
   h. The organizers will have all rights for the use of these pictures as and when they deem it.
   i. Digital images are evaluated on the basis of (I) IMPACT, (II) COMPOSITION, (III) TECHNICAL QUALITY, and (IV) SUITABILITY for the specific theme.
   j. Additional instructions will be announced on the spot.


JACKPOT :
a. Only student Co-ordinator [one boy and one girl] of the respective contingent of
   the college are eligible, at their option, to participate in this event.
b. There will be in all six prizes. First place in boys category will be awarded “Mr.
   University” while in girls category, “Miss. University” Besides first and second
   runners up in each of the categories will also be awarded prizes.
c. Participants will be adjudged under the following components :
   A] Personality Contest
   B] Cultural Performance
   C] Physical Endurance/Skill
   D] I.O. and General Awareness
   E] Oratory [Public speaking/comparing]
   F] Leadership
   G] Academic performance
   H] Assessment of Bio-data
   I] Medical fitness and
   J] Psychological Testing
d. There may be an audience poll in components of [I] Personality Contest and
   Presentability in the following manner :
   1. Each college will be given an equal number of passes per each entry, for the
      inaugural and valedictory function [Prize Distribution Day].
   2. Pass holders will be permitted to occupy the seats, sharp at the time
      mentioned. After 30 minutes, in case of vacant seats, it will be open for the
      general students who do not have the entry passes. Once all the seats of the
      auditorium are full, no one will be permitted to enter even if a person has an
      entry pass.
   3. At any point of time, I prescribed form for the poll will be distributed only to
      the audience present in the auditorium at that time and similarly, the forms
      will be collected only from the audience present in the auditorium at a
      desirable time. Hence, the audience is expected to be present throughout the
      event.
   4. Participants of this event are expected to attend the meeting of student co-
      ordinators communicated from time to time.
   5. The maximum marks to be assigned in each of the components is 10 which
      will be converted into a ten point scale after dividing by ten.

VERSATILITY CONTEST:
The Versatility Contest was introduced with a view to selecting the most versatile artist of the University portraying multidimensional talents in various fields of art and culture. The brief outline of this
competition is likely to be as follows:

1. Each college can depute one student by filling a separate entry form for this competition. In addition, all the winners of prizes and merit certificates in various events of the Inter-Collegiate shall be
deemed eligible for this competition without filling an entry form, if they decide so. Under the circumstances, there shall be no restriction on the number of participants from any of the colleges who are
qualified for participation through this category.

2. It shall be compulsory for all the prize winners seeking first and second places in the events in which AIU conducts the Inter-University competitions to make themselves available for selection trials,
which shall be clubbed with this competition of versatility. Similarly, the performance of the student at Zonal and National levels will also be considered.

3. This competition shall be conducted at the end of the Inter-Collegiate Cultural Competitions and shall be shown in the timetable.

4. There will be 3 rounds of this competition as follows:
   [I] Elementary Round: The participants will be required to give performances in any of the three units from the list shown below with a single restriction that a person opting for acting and miming can opt
   for the literary unit only if the performance is in Quiz and not in any other literary events, such as Elocution, Debate, Short Story Writing, etc.

   Sr. No.   | Unit                       | Duration
   ---------|-----------------------------|-----------------------
   1.       | Acting                      | 3 Minutes
   2.       | Mime                        | 3 Minutes
   3.       | Dance                       | 3 Minutes
   4.       | Vocal Music                 | 3 Minutes
   5.       | Instrumental Music          | 3 Minutes
   6.       | Painting/Collage/Poster/Cartooning/Rangoli/Clay Modeling/Spot Photography | 1 Hour
   7.       | Literary                    | 3 Minutes [15 Minutes for Quiz]

   There shall be no restriction on the choice of performance, and one is free to choose also from the films, Indian or Western. The judges/organizers shall only reserve the right to stop any performance
   instantly if, in their opinion, it is not dignified enough befitting the reputation of the University.


Only those who attain a minimum of 50% marks in each of the three units shall qualify for the second/semi-final round, in which they shall again be required to perform in any of the 5 units from the above
table. A minimum of 6 and a maximum of 10 students who secure the highest number of marks in the semi-final round shall be invited for the final round, in which they shall be required to give performances in
as many units as they wish from the following table:

Sr. No. | Unit                                                      | Duration
--------|-----------------------------------------------------------|----------------
1.      | Acting                                                    | 3 Minutes
2.      | Mime                                                      | 3 Minutes
3.      | Classical Dance                                           | 5 Minutes
4.      | Folk/Record Dance/Western                                | 3 Minutes
5.      | Classical Vocal [Hindustani/Karnatik]                   | 5 Minutes
6.      | Light Vocal [Indian/Western]                             | 3 Minutes
7.      | Swarvadya [Classical]                                    | 5 Minutes
8.      | Swarvadya [Light]                                         | 3 Minutes
9.      | Percussion [(Solo/Percussion or Rhythmn instrument)      | 3 Minutes
        |   (accompanist to any other participant)]
10.     | Painting/Collage/Poster Making/Cartooning/Rangoli/Clay  | 1 Hour
        |   Modeling/Spot Photography
11.     | Elocution                                                 | 3 Minutes
12.     | Quiz                                                      | 15 Minutes
13.     | Short Story Writing                                       | 1 Hour
14.     | Mimicry                                                   | 5 Minutes

The marks of the student in the final round as well as their performance at the Zonal and National level Competitions organized by the Association of Indian Universities will be considered while giving the
title "Artist of The Year," whereas the points as per that of any other individual event shall be credited to the respective colleges whose students secure the first three positions.


MAHARASHTRA ACT No. VI OF 2017
[THE MAHARASHTRA PUBLIC UNIVERSITIES ACT, 2016.]
[This Act received the assent of the Governor on the 10th January 2017;
assent first published in the Maharashtra Government Gazette, Part IV,
on the 11th January 2017.]
Amended by Mah. 27 of 2018 (28-11-2017)*
48 of 2018 (6-8-2018)*
An Act to provide for academic autonomy and excellence, adequate
representation through democratic process, transformation,
strengthening and regulating higher education and for
matters connected therewith or incidental thereto.
WHEREAS it is expedient to provide for academic autonomy to non-agricultural
and non-medical universities in the State of Maharashtra and to make better provisions
therefor;
AND WHEREAS the Government of Maharashtra had appointed committees under
the Chairmanships of Dr. Arun Nigvekar, Dr. Anil Kakodkar, Dr. Ram Takwale and Late
Mrs. Kumud Bansal with a view to consider and recommend on different aspects of
higher education and learning and to suggest various measures to ensure such
autonomy;
AND WHEREAS after considering the recommendations of the said committees
the Government of Maharashtra considers it expedient to make a law to provide for
academic autonomy and excellence, adequate representation through democratic
process, transformation, strengthening and regulating higher education and to regulate
the non-agricultural and non-medical universities in the State of Maharashtra in more
effective manner, to provide for participation of universities in social and educational
spheres, to establish Maharashtra State Commission for Higher Education and
Development, to constitute various Boards, and to repeal the Maharashtra Universities
Act, 1994; it is hereby enacted in the Sixty-Seventh Year of the Republic of India as
follows:—
CHAPTER I
PRELIMINARY
1. (1) This Act may be called the Maharashtra Public Universities Act, 2016.
(2) It shall come into force on such date** as the State Government may, by
notification in the Official Gazette, appoint.
2. In this Act, unless the context otherwise requires,—
(1) “academic services unit” means university science and instrumentation
centre, academic staff college, computer centre, university printing press or any
other unit providing specialized services for the promotion of any of the objectives
of the university;
(2) “adjunct professor”, “adjunct associate professor” or “adjunct assistant
professor” means a person from industry, trade, agriculture, commerce, social,
cultural, academic or any other allied field who is so designated during the period
of collaboration or association with the university;
1. For Statement of Objects and Reasons, see Maharashtra Government Gazette, 2016, Extra Part V-A,
dated the 6th April, 2016, Page 118.
# For Report of Joint Committee, see Maharashtra Government Gazette, 2016 Extra Ordinary
No. 41, Extra Ordinary Part V-A, dated the 5th December 2016.
Maharashtra Ordinance No. I of 2018 was repealed by Mah. 27 of 2018.
* This indicates the date of commencement of Act.
** This Act came into force on 1st March 2017 vide G.N.H & TED, MPIJA-2015/(319/15)/
Uni-4/Part-2,MGG Part IV B, dated the 27th February 2017.

3. “affiliated college” means a college which has been granted affiliation by
the university;
4. “authorities” means the authorities of the university as specified by or
under this Act;
5. “autonomy” means a privilege of the university conferred by the Statutes
to permit a college, institution or a university department to conduct academic
programmes and examinations, develop syllabus for the respective subjects and
issue certificates of passing the examinations;
6. “autonomous college”, “autonomous institution” or “autonomous
department” means a college, institution or department to which autonomy is
granted and is designated to be so by the Statutes;
7. “bodies” means the bodies of the university formed by the respective
authorities;
8. “Chancellor” and “Vice-Chancellor” means, respectively, the Chancellor
and the Vice-Chancellor of the university;
9. “choice based credit system” means the curricular system that offers multiple
interdisciplinary choices for students to select from the courses (core, elective or
minor or soft skill courses) to accumulate credits as prescribed in Statutes;
10. “cluster university” means the cluster university established under
sub-section (6) of section 3 of the Act;
11. “collaboration” means collaborative academic activity of the university or
college or institution with other universities, academic institutions including local,
regional, national or international institutions, research institutions and
organizations in the field of agriculture, industry, trade and commerce, sports,
social, cultural, science, technology and any other field;
12. “college” means a college affiliated to the university, situated in the
university area or jurisdiction;
13. “College Development Committee” means the College Development
Committee constituted under section 97 of this Act;
14. “Collegium of Heads of Department of Affiliated Colleges and recognized
institutions” means an electoral college consisting of heads of departments from
affiliated colleges and recognized institutions who shall elect from amongst
themselves as members to the concerned authorities;
15. “Collegium of Graduates of the University” means an electoral college
consisting of registered graduates of the university, who shall elect from amongst
themselves as members to the different authorities;
16. “Collegium of Management Representatives” means an electoral college
consisting of representatives of management committees of affiliated or autonomous
colleges or institutions who shall elect from amongst themselves as members to
the different authorities;

17. “Collegium of Principals” means an electoral college consisting of full-time
approved Principals and Directors of recognized institutions who shall elect from
amongst themselves as members to the different authorities;
18. “Collegium of Teachers” means an electoral college consisting of full-time
approved teachers from affiliated and autonomous colleges and recognized
institutions, who shall elect from amongst themselves as members to the different
authorities;
19. “Collegium of University Teachers” means an electoral college consisting
of full-time teachers from University Departments, University Institutions, and
Conducted Colleges appointed by the university who shall elect from amongst
themselves as members to the different authorities;
20. “Commission” means the Maharashtra State Commission for Higher
Education and Development constituted under section 76 of this Act;
21. “community college” means an institution providing skill-based academic
programs as prescribed in the Statutes;
22. “conducted college” means a college maintained and managed by the
university;
23. “De-notified Tribes (Vimukta Jatis)” means tribes declared as such by the
State Government, from time to time;
24. “department” means a department teaching a particular subject or a group
of subjects in a college or an institution as prescribed in the Statutes;
25. “Director” means a head of an institution including a center or a school
of the university as designated by the Management Council or a head of a
recognized institution;
26. “Director of Higher Education” and “Director of Technical Education”
means respectively Director of Higher Education, Maharashtra State and Director
of Technical Education, Maharashtra State;
27. “Empowered Autonomous College” means an autonomous college that is
identified by the University Grants Commission as College with potential for
Excellence or College Excellence, which has high level grade as specified by the
Government by notification in the Official Gazette as has been given the status of
Empowered Autonomous College by the Authority under the Statutes, with a
power to grant degree of such College jointly with the affiliating University;
28. “Empowered Autonomous Cluster Institutions” means a group of
autonomous Colleges or institutions of the same management or educational
society which includes the colleges or institutions, identified by the University
Grants Commission as College with potential for excellence or College of excellence,
which have high level grade as specified by the Government by notification in the
Official Gazette as has been given the status of Empowered Autonomous Cluster
Institution by the Authority under the Statutes, and is empowered to grant a joint
degree with the affiliating University;

29. “Empowered Autonomous Skills Development College” means a college
which has been recognized by the university for conducting the skills development
programmes as prescribed by the university as per the National, State Level policy
regarding Skills Qualification and Education Framework and which is given the
status of Empowered Autonomous Skills Development College by the university
to which it is affiliated and is empowered to grant a joint degree, certificate,
diploma and advanced diploma with the affiliating university;
30. “fee” means tuition fees, other fees and charges, including developmental
charges;
31. “Head of the University Department”, “Head of the Institution” and
“Head of the College Department” means respectively, a Head of the University
Department, a head of the recognized institution and a head of the college
department, as prescribed in the Statutes;
32. “higher education” means the pursuit of knowledge beyond learning at
the stage of higher secondary school education;
33. “Hostel” means a place of residence for the students of the university or
a college or an institution, provided, established, maintained, by the university or
college or institution, as the case may be;
34. “institution” means an academic institution of higher learning, not being
a college, associated with and admitted to the privileges of the university;
35. “inter-disciplinary studies” means the combined academic studies and
research in different disciplines as prescribed by statutes;
36. “Knowledge Resource Centre” means a library established by the
university on the campus or sub-campuses of the university to hold in print,
electronic and audio-video format material, monographs, reference volumes, text
and review books, all types of journals and any other material in various formats
useful for education, research, extension services or for similar purposes;
37. “management” means the trustees or the managing or governing body, by
whatever name called, of any trust registered under the Maharashtra Public Trusts
Act, or any society registered under the Societies Registration Act, 1860 or a
Company registered under section 8 of the Companies Act, 2013, under the
management of which one or more colleges or recognized institutions or other
institutions of higher learning, are conducted and admitted to the privileges of the
university:
Provided that, in relation to any college or institution established or maintained
by the Central Government or the State Government or a local authority like a Zilla
Parishad, Municipal Council or Municipal Corporation, it means, respectively, the
Central Government or the State Government or Zilla Parishad or the Municipal
Council or the Municipal Corporation, as the case may be;
38. “multi-disciplinary studies” means the combined academic studies and
research in different streams of a particular discipline as prescribed by Statutes;

39. “Nomadic Tribes” means tribes wandering from place to place in search
of their livelihood, as declared by the State Government, from time to time;
40. “non-vocational academic staff” means such staff as the State Government
may classify to be non-vocational academic staff and includes all such staff which
is complementary to academic staff but shall not include the staff engaged purely
in discharging administrative functions;
41. “Other Backward Classes” means any socially and educationally backward
classes of citizens as declared by the State Government and includes Other
Backward Classes declared by the Government of India in relation to the State of
Maharashtra;
42. “post-graduate department” means a department in a college or institution
of higher learning, research or specialized studies, recognized to be so by the
university and imparting post-graduate instruction or guidance for research;
43. “prescribed” means prescribed by Statutes or Ordinances or Regulations,
as the case may be, made by or under this Act;
44. “Principal” means a teacher who is duly approved as a Principal by the
university;
45. “Pro-Vice-Chancellor” means the academic and executive officer, next to
the Vice-Chancellor having purview of the entire university;
46. “recognized institution” means an institution of higher learning, research
or specialized studies, other than a college, and recognized to be so by the
university;
47. “registered graduate” means a graduate of a university registered or
deemed to be registered by or under this Act with one of the universities;
48. “satellite centre” means an integral part of an affiliated or conducted
college or recognized institution imparting academic programmes, co-curricular,
research and extension activities in rural or tribal region, neighboring the location
of such college or institution, established with the object of reaching the unreached,
on the terms and conditions specified by the State Government by an Order in the
Official Gazette;
49. “Schedule” means the Schedule to this Act;
50. “Scheduled Castes” means such castes, races or tribes or parts of, or
groups within, such castes, races or tribes as are deemed to be Scheduled Castes,
in relation to the State of Maharashtra under article 341 of the Constitution of India;
51. “Scheduled Tribes” means such tribes or tribal communities or parts of
or groups within, such tribes or tribal communities as are deemed to be Scheduled
Tribes in relation to the State of Maharashtra under article 342 of the Constitution
of India residing in any part of the State of Maharashtra;
52. “school” means a school of studies maintained by or recognized as such
by the university or autonomous college, Empowered Autonomous College,
Empowered Autonomous Cluster Institution;

53. “Skills Knowledge Provider” means an institution which has been
recognized by the university for conducting such courses as prescribed by the
university as per the National, State Level policy regarding Skills Qualification
Framework;
54. “Special Backward Category” means socially and educationally backward
classes of citizens declared as a Special Backward Category by the State
Government;
55. “State” means the State of Maharashtra;
56. “State Government” or “Government” means the Government of
Maharashtra;
57. “Statutes”, “Ordinances” and “Regulations” means, respectively, the Statutes,
Ordinances and Regulations of the university, made by or under this Act;
58. “Student” means an individual who is admitted and registered for an
academic programme of the University or affiliated, conducted, autonomous
colleges and recognized, institutions of the University;
59. “Students Council” means the Students Council established under section
99 of the Act;
60. “Sub-Campus” means a comprehensive inherent independent unit of the
university for a predetermined geographical jurisdiction for decentralization of
academic, administrative, research and extension activities of that jurisdiction,
with the objective of improving efficiency and effectiveness;
61. “teacher” means a full-time approved professor, associate professor, assistant
professor, reader, lecturer, librarian, principal, Director of an institution, Director
of Knowledge Resource Centre, Director of Centre of Lifelong Learning and
Extension, deputy or assistant librarian in the university, college librarian, Director
or instructor of physical education in any university department, conducted,
affiliated or autonomous college, autonomous institution or department or
recognized institution of the university;
62. “Tribunal” means the tribunal established under section 80 of the Act;
63. “university” means any of the public universities mentioned in the
Schedule and includes a cluster university within the meaning of sub-section (6)
of section 3;
64. “university area” means the area specified against the name of the
university in the Schedule;
65. “university department” means a department established and maintained
by the university as prescribed by the Statutes;
66. “University Grants Commission” means the University Grants Commission
established under the University Grants Commission Act, 1956;
67. “university institution” means a center, a school, or an institute established
and maintained by the university as prescribed by the Statutes;
68. “university teacher” means a full-time teacher appointed by the university.

University of Mumbai, informally known as Mumbai University (MU), stands as one of India's oldest state
universities, tracing its establishment back to 1857. The university boasts a commendable ranking of 56 
in the 'University' category as per the NIRF 2023. Additionally, it holds accreditation with an A++
grade by NAAC and is approved by the UGC. Internationally, the QS World University Rankings 2024 places
the University of Mumbai in the bracket of 751-760, while it secures a spot within 301 - 350 in the QS
Asia Rankings 2023.

Mumbai University operates from two main campuses – Vidyanagri & Fort – and extends its reach through
three sub-campuses located at Ratnagiri, Thale, and Kalyan. Offering a diverse spectrum of over 200 UG,
PG, diploma, doctoral, and certificate programs, the university spans across disciplines such as
Engineering, Arts, Science, Management, Law, and more. These programs are facilitated through 56
departments and a network of over 700 affiliated colleges.

For those seeking a more flexible approach to education, Mumbai University provides distance learning
programs through its Institute of Distance and Open Learning (IDOL Mumbai University). Admission to
Mumbai University courses is primarily based on merit or entrance exams.

In terms of placements, Mumbai University records a placement rate of 70% and 85% for UG 3-year and PG
2-year placements, respectively, in 2022. The university ensures a conducive learning environment,
offering extensive infrastructural facilities. From a digital library to separate hostels for male and 
female students, the campus provides amenities like a gym, guest house, cafeteria, sports complex,
virtual classrooms, health care center, and more.

Established in 1857, the University of Mumbai, a State University with two campuses at Vidyanagri and
Fort, boasts accreditation with an A++ Grade from NAAC. It affiliates with 781 colleges and holds
impressive rankings, including 56th in NIRF 2023 (University category) and 751-760 in QS World
University Rankings 2024. The application process is online, and admission is merit or entrance-based,
considering popular entrance exams like CUET, MHT CET, MAH CET, JEE Main, NEET, and CMAT. Offering a
diverse range of courses such as MBA, BTech, and BSc, Mumbai University also provides merit and means
scholarships, with results accessible here. For more information, visit the official website.

In its 161-year journey, the University has evolved into a prominent intellectual and moral force,
contributing significantly to both the nation and the city of Mumbai. Initially focused on undergraduate
education and examinations, the University expanded its scope to include research and postgraduate
instruction, leading to the establishment of various departments and institutes.

With campuses sprawling over 243 acres at Vidyanagari and 14 acres at Fort, along with sub-campuses in
Ratnagiri (20 acres), Thane (6.50 acres), and Kalyan (6.26 acres), the University hosts 60 departments
749 affiliated colleges, and has garnered recognition for its industrial and international
collaborations, offering a spectrum of professional courses.

Nationally, the University excels in sports, culture, and outreach activities, witnessing substantial
growth in student enrollment, research publications, and international collaborations over the last five
years. Notably, there has been a 104% increase in undergraduate students, a 112% increase in
postgraduate students, and a remarkable 147% surge in distance education students.

Demonstrating a commitment to academic excellence, the University has achieved a 156% increase in
research papers published in international journals. Twelve departments/sections are recognized under
various national programs, such as SAP/CAS/DRS/DSA/COSIST/FIST, and over eighty teachers actively
participate in professional bodies. Furthermore, teachers have earned eighteen national/international
awards in the last five years, with around 20 teachers undertaking academic activities abroad annually.
The University continues to innovate, recently introducing more than ten self-supporting courses,
reinforcing its dedication to education and research.

The Faculty of Arts at the University of Mumbai offers a Bachelor of Arts (B.A) program, a three-year
integrated course. Eligibility requires candidates to have passed the Higher Secondary School
Certificate (Std. XII) examination, meeting specific subject requirements in English, a language course,
and any four subjects carrying 100 marks each. Alternatively, candidates with vocational subjects or
competency-based vocational courses are also eligible. The program aims to provide a comprehensive
education in the arts.

In addition to the B.A program, the Faculty offers a specialized course, the B.A. Programme in Film,
Television, and New Media Production (C.B.S.G.S.), a three-year integrated course with six semesters.
Eligibility for this program requires candidates to have passed the Higher Secondary School Certificate
Examination or an equivalent recognized by the University. The degree is awarded upon completion of the
prescribed course of study, earning 120 credits over three academic years, and fulfilling specific grade
requirements in core and specialized papers. This program focuses on the practical aspects of film,
television, and new media production.

The University of Mumbai offers a Five Years Integrated Programme (B.A. and M.A.) degree course in
Russian. To be eligible for entry into the first year of this program, candidates must have passed the
HSC (12th Std) examination with a minimum of 50%. This program is designed to provide comprehensive
education in Russian language and culture.

Another Five Year Integrated (B.A. and M.A.) degree course is available in German Studies. Candidates
opting for this course must have passed the HSC examination with a minimum of 45% and must have chosen
German as a foreign language in the XII standard. Alternatively, candidates can pass with 45% in HSC,
clear the Diploma Course in German offered by the University of Mumbai, or clear Grundstufe III offered
by Goethe Institute (Max Mueller Bhavan). This program focuses on German language and related studies.

The Bachelor’s Degree in Library & Information Science (B.L.I.Sc.) is a one-year program. Eligibility
requires candidates to have passed a degree examination of the University of Mumbai or a university
recognized by this University. Graduates from other universities need to apply for a Certificate of
Eligibility/Migration Certificate, and no admission is allowed without these certificates. The program
aims to provide specialized knowledge in library and information science.

The Bachelor of Social Work (B.S.W.) is a three-year full-time degree course. Eligibility requires
candidates to have passed the HSC examination conducted by the Maharashtra State Board of Secondary and
Higher Secondary Education or an equivalent examination recognized by the University of Mumbai.
Alternatively, candidates can have passed the First Year Arts or Science or Commerce of the four-year
B.A. or B.Sc. or B.Com. degree course of this University or an equivalent examination.

The Bachelor of Mass Media is a three-year degree course. Eligibility requires candidates to have passed
the XIIth Std. Examination of Maharashtra Board of Higher Secondary Education or its equivalent from the
Science, Arts, or Commerce Stream. Admissions are based on merit, and no entrance test is conducted.
Weightage is given to students from Arts, Commerce, and Science streams at the 12th Standard level, with
specific percentage allocations for each stream. The merit list is prepared and displayed stream-wise,
following the reservation policy prescribed by the Government of Maharashtra. The admissions process is
outlined to ensure fair distribution of seats among the three streams.

The Bachelor In Heritage Management (B.H.M.) program, governed by Ordinance No. O.5416, requires
candidates to have passed the XIIth Std examination of the Maharashtra Board of Higher Secondary
Education or its equivalent with a minimum of 45% marks in aggregate at the first attempt. This three
year (six Semesters) full-time program, as per Circular No. UG/414 of 2004 (Dated 28th September, 2004),
is open to Commerce, Science, and Arts candidates. Additionally, applications from graduate students are
considered based on the same percentile considerations.

For the Master of Arts (M.A.) program, as outlined in Ordinance No. O.2237, eligibility criteria include
passing the examination for the degree of Bachelor of Arts (three-year integrated course) of this
University or the degree of Bachelor of Arts (Old, four-year course) of this University, or a degree of
another recognized University deemed equivalent. Graduates from this University in faculties other than
Arts or those with an equivalent examination from another recognized University, seeking admission to
the M.A. degree course by papers, will be considered based on individual merits. The duration of this
two-year program involves a University examination at the end of each year, namely M.A. Part I and II.
The Circular No. UG/Gen/104 of 1989 provides detailed guidelines for the admission process, including a
waived change of Faculty Test for students registering with the Directorate of Distance Education.


St. Xavier’s College, located in Mumbai and affiliated with the University of Mumbai, proudly holds the esteemed title of India’s premier private autonomous college. This recognition, bestowed by Education World for two consecutive years, reflects the institution's commitment to excellence. Offering a rich array of educational programs, including Undergraduate, Postgraduate, Certificate, and Diploma courses in Arts, Science, Business, and Commerce, St. Xavier’s College stands as a beacon of academic diversity.

Admission to these programs follows a rigorous process, considering both merit and entrance criteria. The entrance exam cut-offs, ranging from 92-98 percentile for general category students, ensure a competitive yet inclusive selection process.

In the dynamic realm of placements, St. Xavier’s College has not only excelled but showcased substantial growth in the number of offers during the 2020 placement drive. The pinnacle of this success was marked by a remarkable highest salary package of INR 30 LPA. Renowned recruiters such as Accenture, Axis Bank, Crisil, Mahindra & Mahindra, SAP, and others contribute to the college's stellar placement records.

Highlighting the academic landscape, St. Xavier’s recently introduced a Comparative and Applied Ethics diploma course, running from July to February. Further solidifying its position in the Arts domain, the college secured a notable ranking for Arts by Week 2020. The institution maintains a commitment to diversity with reserved seats for Christian minorities and candidates from scheduled castes and tribes.

At the core of St. Xavier’s College is its exceptional faculty, dedicated to providing guidance and unwavering support to students. The college's residential facilities include separate hostels for girls and boys, offering a conducive environment with room-sharing options for pairs of candidates. Comprehensive hostel amenities contribute to an overall excellent living experience.

St. Xavier’s College is mindful of financial considerations, with annual fees varying from INR 5,000 to INR 75,000. The availability of financial aid options further ensures that quality education at St. Xavier’s remains accessible to a diverse student population.

In essence, St. Xavier’s College emerges as a distinguished choice, offering not only academic excellence but also a nurturing environment for holistic student development.

St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai, is renowned for its consistent recognition and excellence in education, as reflected in its impressive rankings and diverse array of courses. Securing the 87th position in the College Category according to NIRF 2022 and an overall rank of 90th in NIRF 2020, the college holds an esteemed A+ accreditation from NAAC, showcasing its commitment to delivering quality education. Notable achievements include securing the 4th position for Commerce and the 10th position for Science in The Week 2019, the 8th position for Arts in The Week 2020, and maintaining excellence with the 6th position for Arts in The Week 2021.

Diving into the comprehensive Courses and Fees Overview, St. Xavier’s College caters to a diverse range of academic interests. The Bachelor of Arts (BA) program, requiring 10+2 eligibility, employs an Entrance Test for selection, with fees amounting to INR 5,537 for the first year. Similarly, the Bachelor of Management Studies (BMS) program, open to 10+2 graduates, necessitates an Entrance Test for selection, with a first-year fee of INR 36,009. The Bachelor of Commerce (B.Com) program, open to 10+2 graduates, follows the same selection process and features a first-year fee of INR 5,537.

For the Bachelor of Science (B.Sc) program, targeting 10+2 graduates, an Entrance Test is conducted for selection, and the first-year fee amounts to INR 7,187. The Master of Science (M.Sc) program, requiring a degree in B.Sc for eligibility, follows a Merit-Based selection process, with a first-year fee of INR 15,674. The Master of Arts (M.A) program, open to Bachelor’s Degree holders, employs a Merit-Based selection process, with a first-year fee of INR 74,845. The Ph.D. program, requiring Post Graduation for eligibility, follows the selection process of PET/SET/NET/GATE.

In essence, St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai, distinguishes itself by providing an extensive range of courses, each tailored with specific eligibility criteria and selection processes. The varying fees across programs underscore the institution's commitment to offering diverse educational opportunities in Arts, Commerce, Science, Management, and more. This commitment, coupled with the college's esteemed rankings, solidifies its dedication to delivering quality education across a spectrum of academic disciplines.

Anticipating the academic year 2023, St. Xavier’s College in Mumbai is poised to establish cutoff marks for various courses. Catering to diverse categories such as General (HSC), General (Other Boards), SWD (Specially-abled), Christians (HSC), Christians (Other Board), and Special Category, the college aims to set benchmarks for each. For the Bachelor of Management Studies (BMS), the expected cutoffs include 91.60 for General (HSC), 95.87 for General (Other Boards), 83.93 for SWD, 85.27 for Christians (HSC), 84.00 for Christians (Other Board), and 94.93 for the Special Category.

Similarly, the Bachelor of Arts in Mass Communication and Journalism (BA MCJ) is anticipated to have cutoffs like 90.13 for General (HSC), 93.72 for General (Other Boards), 77.00 for SWD, 84.27 for Christians (HSC), 79.60 for Christians (Other Board), and 91.64 for the Special Category. The Bachelor of Science in Information Technology (BSc IT) may have cutoffs of 73.53 for General (HSC), -- for General (Other Boards), 53.40 for SWD, 61.40 for Christians (HSC), -- for Christians (Other Board), and 86.16 for the Special Category.

Lastly, the Bachelor of Commerce (B.Com) is expected to set cutoffs at 98.17 for General (HSC), 100 for General (Other Boards), -- for SWD, 97.92 for Christians (HSC), -- for Christians (Other Board), and 99.75 for the Special Category. These anticipated cutoffs are subject to change based on various factors, and candidates are advised to stay informed for the latest updates as they plan their admissions.

St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai, is actively engaged in its placement drive for the 2022 batch, and the outcomes are indeed promising. Noteworthy among the achievements is a BMS student securing an outstanding job offer of INR 30 LPA, showcasing the wealth of high-quality opportunities available to the students. Diverse sectors, including Banking, Consultancy, Marketing, and Finance, are represented by the participating companies, underscoring the college's extensive industry connections. This year witnesses a significant increase of INR 2 - 4 Lakhs in the average remuneration, signaling a positive trajectory in both job offers and compensation.

The preceding academic year 2020-21 marked significant milestones in placements for St. Xavier’s College. A remarkable 30% increase in both the highest and average CTC (Cost to Company) compared to the previous year was observed. Students secured lucrative packages ranging between INR 15 LPA to INR 22 LPA, indicating a robust demand for the college's graduates in the job market. The total number of students placed exceeded 650, a testament to the college's commitment to providing meaningful career opportunities.

Reviewing the placement statistics from the year 2020, over 900 students from various courses actively participated in the placement drive. D.E. Shaw emerged as the highest-paying recruiter, offering a notable CTC of INR 21 LPA. The average CTC for the year stood at INR 6 LPA, emphasizing the consistent growth in the quality of placements at St. Xavier’s College. The college's consistent upward trend in placement figures and CTCs over the years reaffirms its standing as a premier institution for providing excellent career prospects.

St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai, takes pride in its association with a diverse array of top recruiters, including Citi Bank, Deloitte, Radio Mirchi, Zomato, TCS (Tata Consultancy Services), Wipro, Infosys, Star India, Quantum Data Engines, Josh Talks, Federal Bank, and Airtel. These esteemed companies actively participate in the placement process, offering diverse opportunities across sectors such as banking, consultancy, media, technology, and more. The college's robust ties with these industry leaders contribute significantly to the successful placement of its graduates, fostering a dynamic and well-rounded career development environment.

Turning to scholarships, St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai, endeavors to support deserving and needy candidates through various financial aid programs:

The Post Graduate Scholarship For Single Girl Child is tailored for single girl children pursuing a postgraduate course, offering INR 36,200 for a period of two years.

The Open Merit Scholarship for Junior Colleges is awarded to candidates scoring above 60% in SSC, with merit-based placement as the criterion.

The Raja Shri Sahu Maharaj Scholarship supports students with a family income below INR 8 Lakhs, not availing any other scholarship, covering 50% of tuition and examination fees.

The Maulana Azad National Fellowship for Minority Students is available for minority candidates (Sikhs, Jains, Muslims, Christians) pursuing higher-level studies, with eligibility based on minority background.

The GOI Post Matric Scholarship caters to ST/SC/OBC/SBC category candidates who are citizens of Maharashtra, with eligibility criteria being belonging to the ST/SC/OBC/SBC category.

St. Xavier’s College remains committed to fostering an inclusive and accessible education environment through these scholarships, aiming to alleviate the financial burden on students and encourage academic excellence across diverse backgrounds.

St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai Faculty:
St. Xavier’s College takes pride in its vibrant faculty, comprising 137 dedicated members across various departments. The faculty body is characterized by its diversity and expertise, with a significant majority holding esteemed Ph.D. degrees from renowned universities in their respective fields. These seasoned educators are committed to creating a dynamic learning environment, utilizing innovative teaching methods to elevate students' comprehension of complex concepts. The faculty holds diverse roles, including professors, assistant professors, associate professors (Ad hoc), Research Guides, and Instructors. Their unwavering commitment to academic excellence significantly enhances the overall learning experience at St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai.

St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai Alumni:
The prestigious alumni of St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai, stand as luminaries who have made an indelible mark in their respective fields:

Mukesh Ambani:
Renowned as India’s Richest Person, Mukesh Ambani serves as the Managing Director and largest shareholder of Reliance Industries Ltd.

Azim Premji:
An influential Indian Business Tycoon, Azim Premji is celebrated as the Former Chairman of Wipro Limited.

Aaditya Thackeray:
A prominent figure, Aaditya Thackeray holds the role of Cabinet Minister of Tourism and Environment for the Government of Maharashtra.

Rajdeep Sardesai:
An accomplished News Anchor, Journalist, and Author, Rajdeep Sardesai has left a lasting impact in the field of media.

Anil Kapoor:
A celebrated Indian Actor and Film Producer, Anil Kapoor's contributions have been significant in the entertainment industry.

These distinguished individuals showcase the diverse and impactful contributions of St. Xavier’s College alumni across business, politics, journalism, and the entertainment industry. Their success is a testament to the institution's dedication to nurturing talent and cultivating leaders across various fields.

St. Xavier’s College, Mumbai FAQs:
Q1: What is the experience of student life at St. Xavier's College compared to other institutions?
Ans: The atmosphere at St. Xavier's College is distinctive, marked by its rich heritage infrastructure and esteemed reputation. The college has an impressive track record in placements, with top-notch companies like McKinsey, Bain, Google, Citi Bank, KPMG, and E&Y actively recruiting bright and enthusiastic students. The institution upholds a stringent 75% attendance rule, emphasizing its dedication to maintaining academic discipline. The faculty members, known for their exceptional skills, play a pivotal role in guiding students.

Q2: Is St. Xavier's College considered a top-tier institution?
Ans: Indeed, St. Xavier's College is widely acknowledged as one of the premier and distinguished colleges in India under the affiliation of Mumbai University. The college places a strong emphasis on holistic development by offering diverse extracurricular activities. These activities contribute significantly to shaping students' personalities and enhancing their skill sets. St. Xavier's also has a vibrant tradition of promoting culture and literature through various clubs and publications. The college actively engages with NGOs for social causes, and its Malhar fest is a highly popular mega-event among students.

Q3: Is St. Xavier's College an expensive educational institution?
Ans: In comparison to other colleges affiliated with Mumbai University, St. Xavier's College is considered financially feasible. It strikes a balance between brand value and quality education, providing affordable education that offers value for money. The college has become a preferred choice for students seeking a combination of reputation and affordability.

Q4: How challenging is the entrance exam for St. Xavier's College?
Ans: St. Xavier's conducts the XLRI entrance exam, which can be likened to CAT. The XLRI entrance exam covers a spectrum of subjects including General Knowledge, Data Interpretation, Verbal Ability, Essay Writing, and Decision Making. It employs a negative marking scheme.

Q5: Is St. Xavier's College in Kolkata or Mumbai considered superior?
Ans: While opinions may differ on aspects like infrastructure, facilities, and faculty members, St. Xavier's College Kolkata holds a higher rank than its Mumbai counterpart according to NIRF. Both campuses are highly esteemed, and the preference may vary based on individual perspectives.

Q6: What role does the Council for International Programmes (CIP) play at St. Xavier's College, Mumbai?
Ans: The Council for International Programmes (CIP) at St. Xavier's College, Mumbai, serves as a hub for fostering educational connections with global universities. It aims to establish collaborative relationships with leading universities worldwide, offering both short-term and long-term programs for in-house and NRI students.

Q7: Does St. Xavier's College, Mumbai have any upcoming courses?
Ans: Exciting developments are underway at St. Xavier's College, Mumbai. The institution is set to launch a Webinar Series on Transformational Education in the Ignatian Quincentenary. Additionally, it is introducing an Online Diploma in Comparative & Applied Ethics. The college is also gearing up to initiate Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) for Chemistry in Context.

Q8: What role does SACC play at St. Xavier's College, Mumbai?
Ans: The Study Abroad Counselling Centre (SACC) at St. Xavier's College supports students in securing admissions to postgraduate programs at various foreign universities. It provides valuable guidance and assistance for those aspiring to pursue higher education abroad.

Q9: What additional academic facilities does St. Xavier's College offer?
Ans: St. Xavier's College provides cutting-edge academic facilities, including the Caius Laboratory for Interdisciplinary Research and the Central Instrumentation Facility. These state-of-the-art facilities contribute significantly to enhancing the research and learning experiences for students across disciplines.

Q10: Which program at St. Xavier's College boasts the most attractive placement packages?
Ans: While St. Xavier's College maintains commendable placement records across all courses, the B.Sc IT program stands out with the most lucrative placement packages. The program effectively prepares students for successful careers in Information Technology, attracting high-paying job opportunities from renowned companies.

St. Xavier's College Mumbai Fees & Eligibility:
St. Xavier's College Mumbai presents a diverse array of courses, each accompanied by distinctive fees and eligibility criteria. The Bachelor of Science (B.Sc) program, featuring a first-year fee of ₹9,000, welcomes candidates who have successfully completed their 10+2 education. Similarly, the Bachelor of Arts (BA) program, with an initial fee of ₹7,000, is accessible to candidates who have fulfilled the requirements of their 10+2 education. Aspiring students interested in pursuing a Master of Science (M.Sc) degree can do so with a first-year fee of ₹19,600, provided they possess a prior graduation qualification. The Bachelor of Management Studies (BMS) program, with an initial fee of ₹52,000, mandates a 10+2 qualification. The Bachelor of Commerce (B.Com) program, priced at ₹7,000 for the first year, also necessitates a 10+2 qualification. The Master of Arts (MA) program, carrying a fee of ₹75,010 for the first year, requires candidates to have completed their graduation. Additionally, St. Xavier's College offers a Bachelor of Vocation (B.Voc) program with an initial fee of ₹7,355, accessible to candidates who have successfully completed their 10+2 education. These diverse academic offerings cater to a broad spectrum of interests, ensuring students have a plethora of educational opportunities to choose from.